Title
Review for Game, The (1997)
Number of Reviews
43

Author
Darren Marrese II
THE GAME: Film Review by Darren Marrese
        Ahh, September. I love this time of year. School has resumed; the
leaves on the trees are beginning to change color; and all the
mega-budget, mega-hyped and mega-disappointing summer action films are
finally on their way out of our local cinemas. Thus Fall has officially
begun. So, now that another summer of special effect laden films is
over, what can we expect from Hollywood in the months to come? Here's
your answer: exciting dramas like David Fincher's latest film, The Game.
Following hot on the success of 1995's Seven, Fincher has teamed up with
The Net's scribes, John Brancato and Michael Ferris, to bring us a
spectacular psychological thriller more deserving of your hard earned
loonie than any Batman and Robin movie.
        The Game stars Michael Douglas and Sean Penn as two wealthy but distant
brothers. Douglas plays Nicholas Van Orton, a workaholic facing his 48th
birthday. Penn plays Conrad Van Orton, a recovering junkie who prefers
to live on the wild side of life with his family's money. As Nick's
birthday draws nearer, he finds himself haunted by recurring memories of
his long dead father and the inescapable fact that he's alone. Conrad
recognizes Nick's need for a change of pace and gives him a gift
certificate for a strange and mysterious company called Consumer
Recreational Services which promises their clients a 'profound life
experience'. Sound intriguing? Wait, it gets better.
        In a nutshell, so as not to ruin the movie's fantastic plot twists, CRS
specializes in customized games based on each client's psychological and
lifestyle deficiencies. Based on the data that CRS has obtained about
Nick through a series of physical and psychological tests, they devise a
game so twisted and so dangerous that Nick is brought to the very brink
of his sanity, and forced to reevaluate every aspect of his life. The
object of Nick's game, for instance, is to find out what the object of
the game is. Confused yet? So was I, but that's exactly what Fincher
wants us to feel. 
        Half the fun of the film relies heavily on the audiences' ability to
empathize with Nick. For instance, while Nick struggles to understand
the object of the game, the audience finds themselves struggling as
well. Our questions are Nick's questions, and, like Nick, we become
confused and agitated when no answers are given. Just when we think we
know who is real and who isn't, what's part of the game and what isn't,
the creators deliberately throw a monkey wrench into the mechanics of
our expectations and lead us off towards another dead end-again, and
again, and again. In fact, even the ending is deceiving, but you'll have
to go see The Game to see what I mean. Trust me, if you thought the
ending of Seven was shocking, you haven't seen anything yet!
Just because I'm a nobody doesn't mean that I'm not a somebody!

Author
Nick Schaden
    "The Game" is an unbelievable experience. The entire movie feels like a
roller coaster ride combined with an acid trip. From the opening moments to
the final credits, you go from moments of slow compassion to sheer terror
like the drop of a hat. For this and other reasons "The Game" makes for an
absolutely wonderful movie that this reviewer never, ever got sick of.
    "The Game" tells the story of Nicholas Van Orton (Michael Douglas), a
multi-millionaire investment banker. For Nicholas's 48th birthday party his
brother Conrad (Sean Penn) gives Nicholas a gift that "even someone with
everything would love". It's a trip to Consumer Recreational Services to
play some sort of game. After enough prodding by Conrad, Nicholas decides to
give this game a try. The rest of the movie I leave to you the viewer, as
going through the twists and turns that Nicholas goes through are half the
fun. Director David Fincher creates an experience so surreal half the time
the audience doesn't know whether Nicholas's experiences are reality, or all
part of the game.
    To truly make the plot of "The Game" as engrossing as it is for the
audience, the cinematography, becoming almost a trademark of David Fincher's
work, is simply stunning. It's all lead by Harris Savides, who is an expert
at making the audience see through Nicholas's shoes. Sudden camera jerks and
pans are made to create a sense of urgency. Moments of Nicholas's childhood
are played with old home projector clips and piano music in the background
to create a somewhat quaint yet eerie experience.
    As much as plot and cinematography are huge strengths, quite possibly
the biggest plus "The Game" has running for it is the acting. Michael
Douglas plays one of his best performances I've ever seen, he brings
Nicholas's character to life and still makes him believable the entire way
through.
    All in all, "The Game" is a movie that grabs you and won't let go. The
direction, plot, cinematography and acting all make for a movie that in my
humble opinion, has been, and likely will be, the best movie that I've seen
this year.
    Nick's Rating: +4 (Highly Recommended)

Author
Timothy Scott
        When considering David Fincher's latest film, "The Game", four 
words come to mind. "Don't believe the hype." This Michael Douglas 
vehicle, from the director of "Seven", isn't nearly as clever or 
innovatively suspenseful as it would have us believe.
        The film draws us in with an intriguing concept (aided no doubt 
by the riveting trailer) where a jaded millionaire (Douglas) is presented 
with the opportunity to enter into a living fantasy. This isn't simply 
virtual reality. This is real life with a deadly twist.
        On his 48th birthday, Nicholas Van Orton (Douglas) is invited to 
dinner by his underachieving younger brother, Conrad (Sean Penn). Conrad 
has a special birthday present for his brother. He hands Nicholas a gift 
certificate and tells him to contact a company called Consumer Recreation 
Services. "They make your life fun," Conrad tells him. Nicholas humors 
his brother, telling him he'll call, but it's clear he has no time for any 
foolish, "fantasy role-playing," as he calls it.
        Then, for reasons that are never really made clear, Nicholas 
decides to go to CRS and see what they're all about. He ends up spending 
a whole day going through their screening process, which to me made no 
sense considering the tight schedule he keeps claiming to have. 
Nevertheless, when it seems Nicholas has been rejected as a CRS client, 
the weird things start happening. Of course, when we've only covered 
about 30 minutes of screen time, what else should we expect.
        Douglas has built his modern career around playing powerful, 
violent and unlikable men being manipulated by unseen hands. One of those 
films, "Basic Instinct", came from the creative minds of writer, Joe 
Eszterhas and director, Paul Verhoeven.
        The premise of "The Game," is not unlike the concept of another
Verhoeven film, "Total Recall." In that case, the premise was implanting 
someone else's memories as a way to enhance one's own life through a 
dream vacation. Yet, in both films, the real goal is to create a 
vicarious bond with the audience. We live the adventure along with the 
protagonist, reacting to each twist and turn. In theory, the key to the 
suspense is not being to tell what is real and what isn't. All we can do is
hang on until the end of the ride, when the truth is finally revealed.
        Now, for those of you who forgot, let me say this again. "Don't
believe the hype." "The Game" is not a thrilling roller coaster ride. As 
a suspense-thriller, it doesn't do much but spin in circles. By the third 
reel, I was fighting back sleep and checking my watch as I endured the 
predictable plot.  Is it any wonder Douglas won't be able to resist the 
charms of a mysterious, potentially life-threatening blonde (ever heard 
of Glenn Close? No? Well, how about Sharon Stone? Thought so). 
        If anything in this film surprises you at all, I would guess you 
haven't seen that many films. There is no suspense here. Trust me, I 
looked hard to find some. I had to settle for contrived gimmicks and 
ridiculously implausible situations. Fincher aim's for Hitchcock but 
lands somewhere just north of Joe Eszterhas.
        There are those that might say "The Game" is not intended to be 
viewed literally. I would submit that is exactly the way I tried to view 
the film. The film simply does not have the teeth to bite into any real 
psychological issues. 
        There is a moment early in the film where Van Orton,
realizing his game has begun, smiles as he walks through the airport 
trying to figure out who's in on the whole thing. He is charged by his 
paranoia. He is looking at the world through new eyes. It is the last 
thought-provoking moment in the film. From there on, the director only 
wants to stay a step ahead of us. Any significant archetype that is set 
up in the beginning of the film is simply turned into a plot device. At 
the outset, we're told each "game" is tailored to the individual. 
Ultimately, this "game" is supposed to work like a crucible, trying this 
obscenely wealthy and emotionally detached aristocrat by fire, proving 
his soul.
        Yet, as Douglas endures his personal gauntlet, we're given very 
few pieces of the puzzle to illuminate us on who this man really is.
        I wanted to like this film more than I did. I look at it as just
anothergreat idea, poorly realized. I can think of at least two other 
superior films where watching the film didn't mean we were seeing what 
was really happening. Bryan Singer's "The Usual Suspects" for one, a film
that was truly unique in its ability to get you lost in the details before
pulling back to show you the full masterpiece on the canvas. Also, there 
is the underrated "Jacob's Ladder," with Tim Robbins, a film that really
has to be watched twice before you recognize the significance of all its
symbolism. Here are two examples of films that don't simply manipulate for 
manipulations' sake. There are films that use their labyrinth structure 
to lead us to a meaningful place.
        One major issue that comes up in "The Game" is whether or not the
whole "illusion" is just a highly sophisticated con game.  Well, I can 
tell you right now, after you've spent your $7 dollars, you may be asking 
yourself the same thing.

Author
Marty Mapes
*** (out of 4) THE GAME is an exciting, tense mystery, but I suspect it
won't stand the test of time. Like THE CRYING GAME, half the fun is
seeing the movie before you know how it ends. 
Millionaire investor Nicholas Van Orten (Michael Douglas) receives a
birthday gift certificate from his uncultured brother Conrad (Sean
Penn). The certificate is good for a Game at a company called CRS.
Conrad will not explain the Game except to promise that it will change
Nicholas's life. Nicholas, who is too busy for such nonsense, tucks away
the certificate and abruptly ends their lunch. 
A few days later, Nicholas finds himself in the same building as CRS.
Having herard some intriguing word of mouth about the Game, he stops in
to ask a few questions. 
The "few questions" turns into an application to play the Game, which
drags on into hours and hours of psychological and physical testing
(which Michael Douglas' character would have walked out on, had not the
plot required that he stay). 
Once the Game has begun, Nicholas still doesn't know what the game is,
but he gets the idea one night when he goes home . . . . 
Obviously mysterious things begin to happen to Nicholas, which he
correctly identifies as being rigged by CRS. But fewer and fewer obvious
mysteries occur as more and more coincidences and accidents (?) Happen.
Without knowing beforehand, it is impossible to be sure which theory is
correct. 
Congratulations should go to Fincher and screenwriters John D. Brancato
and Michael Ferris. Tension and suspense in movies are relatively easy
to achieve, but inventing a satisfying ending is not. THE GAME avoids
that pitfall. Without revealing the specifics of the ending, I can say
only that it felt right. With 20/20 hindsight I can see that no other
ending would have worked as well (especially in light of my theories set
forth at the end of this review). 
On top of a satisfying story line, the movie had lots else going for it.
One thing is director David Fincher. Looking at his three big features
(ALIEN3, SEVEN, and this one), it is apparent that Fincher has a great
eye for how his films will look in the theater. He uses the blacks of
night and shadow (and luxury cars) to great effect, merging the black on
the screen with the darkness of the theater. One never knows when or
where something may pop up from the black patches of the screen. 
Also, the music was very good. It set the mood but it was not
overbearing. At the end when Nicholas is embraced by the black bag, the
music could have triumphantly swelled, which would have been utterly
inappropriate. Instead, the music warmly welcomed Nicholas home, which
was a more creative and appropriate tone. I find that lately, when I
like the score to a movie, Howard Shore is inevitably the composer - as
he is here. (His score for COP LAND was great and solemn, and the CRASH
soundtrack was so outstanding that I bought the CD). 
Still, the movie is not perfect. When the paranoia and tension are
working, THE GAME is a nail-biter. But that pace is hard to sustain for
a long time and there are gaps where the action seems to stagnate. Also,
there is a lot of visual complexity to THE GAME which almost calls for a
second viewing. But because the movie is so gimmick-oriented, it doesn't
seem to welcome a repeat audience. 
Finally, THE GAME is an interesting study because it works as a metaphor
for moviegoing. Both Nicholas' Game and our moviegoing seem strange at
first. We have better things to do than to waste our time on some
frivolous fantasy. Some good word of mouth usually has to draw us in. 
When Nick applies for the Game, and we go to the moves, we are aware,
for a time, that we are choosing to play along. For Nicholas, the
can't-miss-it clown in the driveway is a fascinating development, but
it's obviously part of the Game. For us, maybe we haven't totally
settled in yet. The popcorn isn't finished or the latecomers are still
walking down the aisles. We know we're at the movies. But when Nick's
Game really gets interesting is when he's not sure that it IS a game.
Likewise, a good movie can draw us in make us forget about or own
"reality" for a while. If Nick's Game had ended differently, the
metaphor would be broken, but because it ended how it did, it makes a
very nice metaphor for the moviegoing experience. 
Taking the metaphor to another level, the party at the end of the movie
was Oscar night; the employees of CRS were really the filmmakers in
Hollywood, congratulating each other, comparing notes from the year, and
partying big. 
A good mystery movie is satisfying but it can never be great. That's
because nobody wants to see it a second time. Once you know how it ends,
a second viewing just isn't that interesting. That's too bad in this
case, because there's a lot to be gleaned from this movie.
Check out more current movie reviews at http://www.indra.com/~mmapes/

Author
Jonathon Krakower
   In this suspense thriller Michael Duglas is an all work and no joke
business man. Duglas who plays a man with no wife only a housekeeper who's
known th family since Duglas' character was a kid. In the movie Duglas
watches his father leap to his death on his 48th birthday. Now it's
duglas' 48th birthday and his brother wants to do something special for
him. Something fun. This present was pretty much a game. The company CRS,
is a company that plays with your mind(as a viewer and a character).  They
manipulate Michael Duglas by messing with his life. Sean Penn who is
metioned a lot on the commercials is not at all as big a character as you
would expect, but he plays his part to the fullest. This is a must see 4
star movie. Probably a few Academy Award nominations. Best character, best
screenplay,and best movie. 

Author
Jamie Peck
Polygram / 1997 / 2:08 / R (brief sexuality, violence, language) 
Cast: Michael Douglas; Sean Penn; Deborah Kara Unger; James Rebhorn; 
Anna Katerina; Armin Mueller-Stahl 
Director: David Fincher 
Screenplay: John D. Brancato; Michael Ferris 
David Fincher is a master of the dark, dreary and depressing. His only 
two previous directing credits are "Alien 3" and "Seven," but anyone who 
has seen either of those films can testify that an unsettling atmosphere 
is practically a character alone whenever Fincher's at the helm. This
menacing ambiance certainly plays a part in "The Game," his extremely 
clever new thriller that incorporates a little of Henri-Georges Clouzot 
and a lot of Alfred Hitchcock, yet still feels like a complete original. 
It's one of those movies where the cinematic experience is far from over 
when the credits start to roll -- in fact, it's really just begun. 
"The Game" stars Michael Douglas as Nick Van Orten, a millionaire 
investment banker who lives only with his maid in an immense San 
Francisco mansion. Birthday number 48 is fast approaching, a milestone 
that is met with both trepidation and surprise; not only is that the age 
his father was when he took his life, but Nick's black sheep brother 
Conrad (Sean Penn) mysteriously surfaces to offer his sibling a surprise 
present -- a gift certificate to a shady agency known as Consumer 
Recreation Services. "They make your life fun," Conrad says to Nick. Um, 
sure. 
Somewhat reluctantly, Nick pays a visit to CSR's downtown offices where 
he learns that his gift is a real-life "game" tailored to match his 
stamina and cerebral capacities. He undergoes a lengthy series of tests, 
both mental and physical, and is sent on his way after being told that 
his game will start without warning. Before too long, strange things 
begin to happen -- occurrences as mundane as his ballpoint pen leaking 
in his breast pocket or as bizarre as a waitress (Deborah Kara Unger) 
spilling drinks on him and then admitting she was paid $400 to do so. He 
also finds keys with the CSR emblem on them all over the place. Nick 
begins to cast a suspicious eye on all of his surroundings, as even the 
most innocent everyday acts -- like taking a cab or watching TV -- seem 
to yield nightmarish circumstances. 
To say anything else about "The Game"'s story would be unfair, because 
the vast enjoyment of this particularly labrynthine mystery is derived 
from its tumbling domino-like chain of events. Surprises are numerous, 
frequent and so involving that Fincher actually positions us in the 
middle of the creepy goings-on. In a sense, we become Nick and work 
through the puzzle with him, and many scenes act as a testament to that. 
When, early in the film, a business associate inexplicitly tells Nick of 
his dealings with CSR only by quoting a Biblical passage -- "I once was 
blind but now I see" -- it's hard to keep the hairs on the back of your 
neck from standing up. There's also a standout sequence where Nick 
ambles through an airport and views every person walking by and every 
object in reach as a element of the game. With Fincher's eerie focus, 
even a baby rattle appears malevolent. 
Much was made of the shocking conclusions to both "Seven" and "Alien 3," 
and when it comes to "The Game"'s finale, "shocking" is quite an 
understatement. I suppose there are those in the audience who will have 
things all figured out by the time "The Game" reaches its actual 
denouement, but its concluding scene is one that probably no one will 
predict. Fincher's execution completely defies expectation, and for that 
reason alone, "The Game" really pulls the wool over your eyes -- this is 
one of those endings that's more genius the more it's thought about, and 
it should be thought about a lot. How the movie arrives there is quite a 
different matter, utilizing sporadic bouts of coincidence and a few 
ideas that are never fully explained or developed, but then again, John 
D. Brancato and Michael Ferris'screenplay so eagerly explores so many 
insane tangents that it's not necessarily jolting that they eventually 
shoot themselves in the foot. 
There are many things to admire about "The Game," and chief among them 
is the Fincher's pure exhilarating craftsmanship. Michael Douglas' 
performance is also wondrous itself, and because his fleshed-out, 
unnerved anti-hero is featured prominently in just about every scene, 
it's quite easy to see what's keeping him on his toes. Nick Van Orten is 
a classic "innocent man on the lam" role, and the movie offers a classy 
yarn for him to run through. And as the game toys with Nick's head, "The 
Game" gets inside ours. 
Š 1997 Jamie Peck 
E-Mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Author
C. Michael Bailey
Take This Is Your Life, A Christmas Carol, and Deathtrap, mix them together
and you get a potent thriller like The Game.  David Fincher, whose previous
outing Seven defined 1990s American noir, issues forth another
provocatively dark treat.
The premise:  Nicholas Van Orton (Michael Douglas) is a wealthy investment
banker in San Francisco who blandly and hard-heartedly goes through the
daily motions of a unhappy life.  Haunted by his father's suicide (recorded
as grainy 8 mm family footage from his childhood) and a failed marriage,
Van Orton manifests his fear and bitterness by coldly firing an old family
friend because of declining profits.  
Enter Conrad Van Orton (Sean Penn), Nicholas' brother.  Conrad, "Connie" to
Nicholas, meets his brother for lunch to wish him a happy birthday.  As a
present, Conrad gives Nicholas and gift certificate to CRS, Consumer
Recreation Services. CRS is a company that specializes in custom tailored
"games" for the participant.  Conrad tells him to call the number on the
card. "To make your life fun," Conrad says.  Fun is something Nicholas
desperately needs to have.
Nicholas is skeptical at first but makes the call to CRS after overhearing
a conversation between two men at his health club.  Curious now, he goes to
the CRS office and is asked to take several psychological and physical
tests that take the better part of a day.  He leaves CRS being told that
they will contact him.  He is contacted, interrupted during a business
meeting on his cellular phone, and is told that his application was
rejected.  He had not provided his cellular number to CRS, a mystery.  And
thus, Nicholas Van Orton's game begins.
After a slow start, The Game accelerates as Van Orton is bounced like a
pinball from one conspiratorial scenario to the next.  Beginning with
finding a wooden clown laying face down in his driveway to fleeing from
assassins to believing that this game is part of an elaborate con to steal
all of his money, Nicholas finds himself becoming more and more off center.
 His carefully controlled world begins to fray and unravel.  Originally
told that "the game" would be a life-changing experience, Nicholas finds
himself dirty and drugged in a Mexican crypt wondering what the experience
is and wondering if it can all be really be real.  As the movie spirals
unpredictably to its conclusion, the viewer, like Van Orton, is wondering
about the "fun" Conrad alluded to earlier in the film.
Michael Douglas is well cast as the financially successful, spiritually
bankrupt Van Orton.  Sean Penn has little more than a bit role in this
film, but is also effective playing Nicholas' dark sheep brother.  Deborah
Unger (most recently in David Cronenberg's Crash) plays a mysterious
waitress at Van Orton's favorite club who ultimately plays a pivotal role
in Nicholas' "game".  Fincher's San Francisco is a dark place though not as
dark as the mythic metropolis of Seven.  The Game proves to be a more
polished and ultimately predictable film than Seven.  Predictable, but not
too predictable. Fincher deftly takes the viewer along for the ride, not
really betraying what is coming next.  This effect is a much because of the
memory of his daring, anti-Hollywood conclusion of Seven as it is his
carefully crafted script.
With The Game, David Fincher emerges as an intriguing and vital force in
American film making.  During this rather fallow time when really fine and
provocative films are few and far between, Fincher and his fine directing
are greatly welcome.

Author
John Roberdeau
Director: David Fincher
Writers: John Brancato, Michael Ferris,
         Larry Gross, and Andrew Kevin Walker
Producers: Cean Chaffin & Steve Golin
"The Game" is one of those movies that people love to call a 'taut
thriller'.
In reference to this film, though, 'taut' is a joke.  Most movies that
categorize themselves as suspenseful thrillers or somesuch have a few
surprises in them and perhaps a twist at the end that you might or might not
have seen coming.  "The Game" is decidedly atypical.  I can honestly say
that
this is one of the most gripping and probably the most suspenseful movie I
have seen.
David Fincher's fingerprints are all over this movie, and that is a very
very
good thing.  From the customary darkness of the city and Michael Douglas'
suits and Sean Penn's hair to the brief explosion of blinding neon in the
middle of the film to the unspeakably suspenseful ending, it's clear who the
director was.  Actually, it's funny, I first heard a while back that David
Fincher had directed some music videos, among which were "Janie's Got a Gun"
by Aerosmith and "Vogue" by Madonna.  I thought that was kind of odd, but
after seeing each of those videos  again, I really feel I should have known.
Also, I have read in a place or two that he is either "strongly influenced
by" or "blatantly copies" a film by the name of Videodrome, but having never
seen it, I cannot comment.
Okay, enough about the director.  Ever since I saw "Wall Street", I have
been
somewhat of a fan of Douglas, though he has made some movies by which I am
decidedly unimpressed.  Even if you don't like him, though, it's very clear
that he was perfectly cast in this role.  It's a role he's been playing
quite
often of late.  Basically, he's the guy from "A Perfect Murder", except he's
a slightly more sympathetic character this time around.
He is, however, not hugely concerned with those around him, including his
brother        Conrad, played by Sean Penn.  Penn is unquestionably one of my
favorite actors, and if you don't agree, you should check out "State of
Grace" and "She's So Lovely".  Anyway, though Penn's role is fairly small,
he is responsible for the goings-on in the movie. For his birthday, Conrad
gives his brother a gift certificate redeemable for participation in a game
that is tailor-made for each participant by a company called Consumer
Recreation Services.  On somewhat of a whim, Nicholas decides to try it out,
and man, do antics ensue!
I really don't see what there is not to like about this film.  There is
certainly the question of plausibility, but it is addressed relatively well
in the movie.  And besides, it's not all that hard to suspend disbelief
for two hours and eight minutes.  It's really a highly entertaining
experience, and if that doesn't        get you, then you can just pay attention to
how beautiful the whole thing is.  I am a big fan of the work of several
people connected with this movie.  Fincher and Andrew Kevin Walker
(co-writer)
worked together on Se7en (possibly my favorite movie ever), and as I said
before, I am a fan of both Douglas and Penn.  This is a movie that just
can't
go wrong.  Give it a try.

Author
Chris Webb
        In "The Net," Sandra Bullock raced against a band of computer 
hackers who sought to erase her identity.  In predictable fashion, she 
was able to outsmart the fiends, saving herself from extinction, in the 
final scene of the movie.  Writers John Braccato and Michael Ferris have 
teamed up again, this time creating a less formulaic and more 
unpredictable thriller in "The Game," with winning results.
        Michael Douglas is San Francisco investment banker Nicholas Van 
Orton.  A composite of his previous cutthroat and tempermental 
businessmen from "Falling Down" and "Wall Street."  Throw in the bad luck 
he experienced in "Fatal Attraction" and "Disclosure," and we have his 
latest character.  Nicholas is a miserly, modern-day Miss Havisham, who 
chooses to rot away in his wealth with nothing but reheated food and 
monotonous financial reports.
        How could this six hundred million dollar man become such a cold 
fish?  While not seeking to find the drive behind his personality, "The 
Game" constructs a past through home video-style flashbacks.  In them, we 
see a young, happy boy with all the luxuries of the rich life his father 
brought to the family.  Unfortunately, the happiness subsides after he 
witnesses his father leaping to his death from the roof of their mansion 
at age forty-eight.  Today happens to be Nicholas' forty-eighth birthday, 
but in his life its just like any other day.
        Dark rooms, cold floors, and bland gray suits abound as Nicholas 
tends to his daily business of being filthy rich and alone.  Director 
David Fincher (Seven) skillfully crafts the image that Nicholas is a 
small cog in the grand scheme, passively living while his fortune builds 
effortlessly.  Wide screen views of him within his mansion or office 
focus on the amenities of a lavish life rather than on Nicholas as a 
charater.  We care about the ineffectuality of these scenes and not about 
the sad, unfortunate man within them.
        The spark plug in the Van Orton family comes in ne'er-do-well 
Conrad, played by a hyperactive Sean Penn.  Conrad has part of the Van Orton 
estate, but does not allow it to rule his life.  Seeing Nicholas' misery, 
he decides he needs to have some fun.  For his birthday, Conrad gives 
Nicholas the opportunity to play a reality based role playing game, 
sponsored by the ominous Consumer Recreation Services.  In order to play, 
Nicholas endures extensive physical and mental tests, while also 
completing endless personality questionnaires.  As the representative 
tells him, this game will provide him with what his life lacks.
        In Nicholas' case, he is bound to have some excitement thrown 
into his life.  It begins while he watches the financial news and the 
newscaster interrupts to tell him the rules of the game.  Essentially, 
whatever happens, happens.  It will not ruin the plot to say that while 
doing business, he cannot open his briefcase, a waitress spills wine all 
over him, he almost drowns in a car accident, and he endures rifle fire.  
While all this is inexplicable to him, the waitress (Deborah Unger) 
reveals that she was bribed to dump drinks on him as part of a prank.
        "The Game" descends into the twisted and macabre as Nicholas 
begins to realize that he cannot bail out of his gift.  The game overlaps 
and overtakes his life when his house is vandalized and his company's 
funds are tapped and drained.  Even his friends seem connected to his 
downfall, and the waitress, who turns up again, has more than just drinks 
to spill on him.
        Technically, Fincher has captured the essence of the thriller 
through a great use of his camera.  The initial expansive views of 
Nicholas in his home, seemingly possessing control of his life, begin to 
close in on him.  As the pressure on Nicholas rises, we find him trapped 
in elevators, running down alleys and dank hallways, and locked in cars.  
Sweat and strain replace the calm and command that Nicholas once 
possessed.  The paranoia runs deep and even Conrad does not appear 
trustworthy.
        After all this, we have quite a way to the end, and I choose not 
to spoil it.  I find it hard to imagine that the ending will be guessed, 
since "The Game" twists where "The Net" plodded straight ahead.  Given 
the way Nicholas treated people in the beginning, its fun to see this 
representative of Douglas' despicable characters be paid back.  With the 
tables turned, the great world that Nicholas has inhabited and ruled does 
not feel quite so comfortable anymore.  
        The acting on the parts of Douglas and Penn, using their 
stodgy and wild-boy images respectably, is amazing and makes this plot 
seem more credible.  The supporting cast are faceless enemies within a 
destructive machinery reminiscent of Stephen Spielberg's "The Duel."  
While the supporters could have held greater speaking parts, but the 
writers and Fincher smartly choose to focus on Nicholas fighting an 
uncontrollable monster.
        "The Game" is an exciting, nerve-wracking thriller, and I highly 
recommend it.  It runs over two hours, but feels as fast as a runaway 
car hurtling toward the San Francisco Bay.

Author
Scott Renshaw
THE GAME
(Polygram)
Starring:  Michael Douglas, Deborah Kara Unger, Sean Penn, James Rebhorn.
Screenplay:  John Brancato and Michael Ferris.
Producers:  Steve Golin and Cean Chaffin.
Director:  David Fincher.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, adult themes, intense situations)
Running Time:  123 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     There are bound to be fans of SEVEN who will view director David
Fincher's follow-up project, THE GAME, as a sell-out...but then again,
where was there to go from SEVEN?  Fincher's 1995 thriller may have been 
the decade's most baffling blockbuster -- a horrifying, unnerving, bleak
vision of millennial dread which was everything a Hollywood success
wasn't supposed to be, yet still somehow made $100 million.  It left
viewers shaken and emotionally drained like nothing in recent memory.  If
Fincher had decided to remake THE EXORCIST for his next project, someone
would have accused him of going soft.
     The wonderfully surprising thing about THE GAME is that it may be the
best choice Fincher could have made.  Free from the ridiculous
expectations of ALIEN3 and the off-putting subject matter of SEVEN,
Fincher might finally be recognized as the most gifted director of
suspense films working today.  THE GAME is a gripping, dizzying and
thoroughly entertaining thriller which bears no resemblance whatsoever to
SEVEN, except in the obvious talent of the director.
     Michael Douglas stars as Nicholas Van Orton, a millionaire San
Francisco investment banker with a big empty house to match his big empty
life.  Enter Nick's black sheep brother Conrad (Sean Penn), with a special
48th birthday present for the man who has everything:  a gift certificate
to a mysterious enterprise called Consumer Recreation Services.  Once
signed up, Nick learns that he will be participating in a
specially-designed game with unknown rules and an unknown object.  He's
not even sure when -- or if -- it will begin.
     And for the audience, that's half the fun.  Fincher wrings an
unbelievable amount of tension out of the likelihood that something will
happen, even though nothing is actually happening.  As Nick strides
through an airport shortly after receiving his first clue in the game, the
confident businessman slowly begins to see every person as a potential
participant, every mundane action or object as potentially loaded with
significance.  The mere idea of loss of control drives Nick nuts; the game
is playing him even before it begins.
     Then the game does begin, and Fincher tightens the screws
psychologically as well as viscerally.  As tautly as he can fashion a
chase or an action sequence, he's even better at creating a pervasive
atmosphere of impending doom, or the unsettling possibility that literally
anything could happen next.  If action/suspense films, according to the
popular metaphor, are roller-coasters, Fincher's ride is a suspended
roller-coaster:  not only are you moving at breakneck speed, you can't
even see the track to anticipate which way you're going to turn.  That's
saying quite a lot because, if you think about it carefully, you'll
realize there's really only one way the film can pay off.  Even though you
may know where THE GAME ultimately will end up, Fincher makes sure you
don't know how you're going to get there.
     THE GAME's somewhat predictable script comes from the team of John
Brancato and Michael Ferris, who sent Sandra Bullock through similar
Everyperson-in-peril paces in THE NET.  Don't let that keep you away.
Michael Douglas' characteristic intensity and determination give THE GAME
an edge Bullock couldn't muster, while Fincher sets up even simple shots
with a shudder-inducing elegance (I'm not sure I've seen an elevator door
open with more menace than it does in THE GAME, and that includes THE
SHINING).  This time, however, it's possible to enjoy Fincher's shudders
with a smile.  THE GAME may not be as profound an experience as SEVEN, but
it's a more satisfying one.  If this is David Fincher's idea of selling
out, I hope folks are buying.  We may be looking at the emergence of this
generation's Hitchcock.

Author
Dan Kim
Note: This review contains spoilers at the end.
Watching "The Game" will fill one with quite a few thoughts and new
concerns when they leave the theater. You will never want to misplace
your keys again for one. Anyone suffering from clown-phobia will make
extra effort to avoid circuses and Venice Beach street actors. You'll
be wary of the next time a waiter or waitress accidentally spills
something on you. These are merely three of the many odd twists and
turns people are asked to take in throughout the entire film.
"The Game," starring Michael Douglas, is a psychological thriller in
every sense of the word. It starts off letting everyone know a little
bit about financial baron Nicholas Van Orton, a businessman with a
knack for making millions but little else. It's almost Gordon Gecko
revisited. He lives an empty life of work and stock reports with little
else going on outside of his office and country club. He's cold-
hearted enough that he can fire the head of a publishing company who
also happens to be a former best friend of his father without batting
an eye. His father was also a successful businessman who inexplicably
committed suicide by jumping off the roof of his estate. He alienates
his ex-wife who is also the mother of his child, he has a brother whom
he hasn't seen or spoken to in years (more on that later). His only
personally link to humanity is a kindly old woman who happens to be his
housekeeper for many years. Yet, throughout the movie, you realize that
he is capable of occasional moments of kindness, a dry humor, and other
interesting quirks. An interesting note; despite his riches, his
ability to dine at exclusive restaurants for during lunch breaks, a
membership at a posh country club, his dinners at home are simple fares
of hamburger and fries, or deli sandwiches. Complex? Yeah. Are you
following this so far?
Sean Penn brilliantly plays the seemingly mentally disturbed brother
Conrad. True Penn-ophiles might be disappointed to know he is limited
to only three scenes, but what little screen time he's given is used to
the utmost max. He first arrives on the scene on to wish Nick a happy
48th birthday and give him a card for a company called "Consumer
Recreation Services," or CRS. Incidentally, their father committed
suicide on his 48th birthday and this topic becomes a taboo topic
during their lunch meeting. Conrad guarantees a life changing
experience and Nick reluctantly agrees to it.
Nick meets up with a rather creepy CRS sales associate Jim Feingold.
Upon agreeing to it, he undergoes a battery of physical, intellectual,
and psychological tests to see if he qualifies to play the game. These
tests take quite a bit longer that expected, which as expected annoys
him, and even more frustrates him later to find out his test results
didn't meet requirements. Not all is what it seems however, as oddities
start popping up around him. One of the first being a waitress named
Christine (Deborah Kara Unger) who "accidentally" spills wine on Nick.
She unwillingly becomes a sidekick to Nick's upcoming mayhem.
The movie is expertly cast, with Douglas being the perfect choice to
play the icy and arrogant Van Orton. Few others can play such a
character with enough flair, charm and self-deprecating humor to the
point that he can get an audience to side with someone who just blew
off his kind ex-wife who called to wish him a happy birthday.
Master visual artist David Fincher takes viewers one a brain twisting,
darkly toned, and often depressingly moody view of San Francisco, the
city where Van Orton resides. Fincher, who last thrilled and disturbed
us in the brilliantly gut-wrenching "Seven," takes us on yet another
visual stunner of paranoia and confusion. He has a Hitchcock-ish eye
for setting the mood and tone of movies by knowing exactly how much
tension and suspense to use without going so far as to completely
alienate the audience. It helps to take your brain with you when you go
to see "The Game" since the clues and hints as to what really is going
on is multitudinous, though nothing will prepare you for the ending of
the movie. More on THAT later.
This movie isn't perfect, however. The otherwise well written plot is
so full of twists and turns that it's easy to not notice the artful eye
stimulation Fincher provides throughout the film. (Editorial note: it's
this very style that, in my humble opinion, kept Alien3 from being a
total disaster). Character development is enough for some, not enough
for others. One certainly gets to know the character of Van Orton as
the movie progresses. Unfortunately we're provided few ideas as to why
Conrad is the way he is. We're also asked to assume why the two of them
are estranged. Their relationship also isn't taken as far as it might
have been.
Depending on how the Game struck you, the ending will either be
fulfilling or a disappointment. Whichever it is, the viewers must
decide for themselves.
The first hour and half however, is a definite can't miss.
My view of the ending? I thought it was brilliant! Despite all the odd
occurrences throughout and the overall fast pace of  the film, I had
little trouble keeping up with the goings on of the Game. The plot
contorts itself and eventually tries to lead us to believe that CRS is
little more than a highly skilled and organized group of con-artist
after Nick's substantial wealth. I started to think Nick was
financially ruined and has little to lose -- even his life -- when I
realized that everything that was going on was in fact a Game. It was
truly a life changing experience, as Conrad promised, and we see this
change in Nick's attitude immediately. He finally shows some warmth
towards both his wife and her new husband. He and his brother start
acting like brothers, and the dead, cold look in his eyes prevalent
throughout the movie is no longer there.

Author
E. Benjamin Kelsey
I had high hopes for this film. I was told it was one of the few movies out
there that I would not be able to guess at all. Well so far, it merely
deserves the "Most Insulting to My Intelligence" award. In fact, I have to
question if two stars wasn't a bit excessive. But, due to a plot that with
quite a bit of work has real potential, and thanks to the decent acting, I
will leave it how it is.
The rumors were right. I didn't have a clue as to what was in store. I get
the impression that the writer might not have either. The plot? A lot of
weird crap happens to a guy and we don't really know why or who is behind it.
In reality, there isn't a lot more to it. It seems as though the writer may
have started this project without knowing what was going to happen next
either; like he just sat down and started writing. After dragging on for two
hours, he finally threw in a lame ending simply to wrap it up.
Warning: I am about to divulge several key elements to the plot that, if you
plan to see this film, will definitely ruin the surprises. But it is crucial
to discuss these in order to show you the absolute absurdity of the movie.
Supposedly there is a company that is meant to spice up your boring life by
playing a game with you, a game you know nothing about, such as how to play,
what to do, or when it will end. Nonetheless, they go to elaborate measures
to find out EVERYTHING about you, then pretty much make you think you're
going to be killed and that they have emptied all your bank accounts. Gee,
that sounds fun.
Supposedly this company knows every single move you're going to make. They
know just where you're going to end up, and exactly when. They don't really
want to kill you . . . it's just all for effect! Such as when they drive you
into a river while locked in the back of a taxi cab. It's a good thing they
know you're going to get out and nothing will go wrong. It's good that when
they drug you and leave you in a graveyard in Mexico, that they know you're
going to make it back, fine and dandy. It's good that they know that you're
not actually going to kill any of them when they're supposedly trying to kill
you! It's a good thing that they know just what day you'll show up at their
office (as if they'd even know that!), and that they know for sure that
you're going to end up running up to the roof. And it's a good thing they
know that you're going to jump off the roof at the exact spot they want you
to. Oh, and by the way, when you find out EVERYTHING they've done wasn't
real, that it was just a prank, and that no, you didn't really kill your
brother and you didn't succeed in killing yourself, it's good that you'll
just smile and shrug it off and join the birthday party they have prepared
for you.
Just talking about this movie gets me so angry that they would try to feed
this to us! The more I think about this movie, the madder I get!
Unfortunately they did too well of a job at their B.S. story that I can't
give them a lower grade. But trust me, THE GAME does deserve special
recognition for its shortcomings! THE GAME is absolutely lame!

Author
James Brundage
You're miserable. Your life is a monotonous routine, the same thing, day
after day. Your business provides you with more money than some small
countries, yet day after day you experience the same living death that is
characteristic of the post-modern rich boy. Douglas is a veteran at the role
of the rich kid, having won a Best Actor Oscar in 1987 for his portrayal of
Gordan Gekko in Oliver Stone's "Wall Street".
In this movie, however, he begins to recognize that Greed may not be as good
as it was made out to be.
On his 38th birthday, business is as usual. It is a day that he dreads due
to the suicide of his father thirty years earlier, in which his father leapt
from the roof of the home in which Douglas now resides.
His brother, Conrad Van Orton, played by "Fast Times at Ridgemont High's"
Sean Penn (ex husband of Madonna and current husband of Robin Wright of
"Forest Gump"), is a perpetual child. Seemingly incapable of being mature,
he makes a lunch date with his brother under the name of Seymour Butts. His
gift is a certificate for an interesting game run by the company CRS
(Consumer Recreation Services).
Staring at the card later at night, just off the phone with his ex-wife and
watching cable he decides to get ready to play.
The next day he goes to CRS, is given a psychological test and a physical,
taking up the entire day, and he is told that his game will begin within a
few days.
That is the question in the back of your mind throughout the entirety of the
movie, as you find yourself thinking for a few seconds that you know what it
is and then contradicting yourself. Is it a con for money? A psychotic
murder plot? A taunting reminder of times past? Or is it really a game?
Whatever it is you know that there is one simple rule for this movie  Trust
No One. And, following that maxim or not following it, you won't know what's
real and what's not until the very last frame.

Author
James Berardinelli
Cast: Michael Douglas, Sean Penn, Deborah Kara Unger, James Rebhorn, 
      Anna Katerina, Armin Mueller-Stahl
Director: David Fincher
Producer: Cean Chaffin, Steve Golin
Screenplay: John D. Brancato, Michael Ferris, Andrew Kevin Walker
Cinematography: Harris Savides
Music: Howard Shore
U.S. Distributor: Polygram Films
     Alfred Hitchcock used the term "refrigerator movie" to describe 
certain films.  According to the great director, refrigerator movies are 
well-paced thrillers that work effectively while being watched, but fall 
apart upon later examination (while "standing in front of the 
refrigerator").  David Fincher's THE GAME is an obvious member of this 
class of motion pictures.  As it's unspooling on screen, the film is 
hugely entertaining, but there are several significant plot holes that 
grow wider the more closely they're investigated.
     This is Michael Douglas' movie.  Sean Penn and Deborah Kara Unger, 
who receive second and third billing, respectively, are supporting 
performers in the truest sense of the word, since neither has more than 
fifteen to thirty minutes of screen time.  Douglas, however, is 
omnipresent.  He's in nearly every scene, and the film is told from his 
character's point-of-view.  And Nicholas Van Orten is the kind of man 
that Douglas plays best -- initially cool and reserved, then gradually 
less and less sure of himself and his circumstances.  The actor's 
intensity in his approach to this character is palpable.
     Nick is a very wealthy man.  He lives in a huge mansion equipped 
with every creature comfort available, but, aside from his housekeeper, 
he is alone.  His wife left him after he elevated the priority level of 
his work over that of his family.  Now, for his 48th birthday, his 
brother, Conrad (Sean Penn), comes up with the perfect gift for the man 
who has everything:  the game.  Developed by a company called "Consumer 
Recreation Services", the game is "a profound life experience" that 
"provides whatever is lacking" in a person's existence.  Beyond making 
obtuse statements like it's "an experiential book-of-the-month club," no 
one is willing or able to describe the game in any detail to Nick.  
Despite his misgivings, he agrees to participate, but events conspire to 
raise a vital question:  is it really all a game, or is it in deadly 
earnest?
     At one point or another, THE GAME reminded me of three past movies:  
the Laurence Olivier/Michael Caine classic, SLEUTH; Martin Scorsese's 
wildly offbeat AFTER HOURS; and the improbable-but-fun MALICE.  All 
three of those films had the same sense of unpredictability evident in 
THE GAME (although, to be fair, SLEUTH and AFTER HOURS were superior; 
MALICE wasn't quite as tightly-scripted).  The one complaint that I have 
about this picture's many turns is that they don't always play fair with 
the audience.  The screenplay was written with the primary intention of 
surprising viewers without much consideration for the practicality or 
logic of the twists.  There are red herrings everywhere, but, unlike in 
the best-constructed mysteries, a few too many of them are superfluous 
and transparent.
     Director David Fincher creates the same kind of dark, brooding feel 
that he developed for both of his previous features, ALIEN 3 and SEVEN.  
Much of THE GAME takes place in the benighted streets of New York City.  
The atmosphere is thick and heavy, and there are times when, coupled 
with Fincher's crisp direction, it effectively distracts us from 
thinking too deeply about the plot.  
     Figuring out all the ins and outs of THE GAME is like piecing 
together a jigsaw puzzle.  We struggle alongside Nick to determine 
what's really going on, and, just when we think we have it, something 
happens to make us doubt our conclusion.  The script has its clever 
moments, and it's easy to mistake this for a smart movie.  However, that 
intelligence is only surface-deep -- the seams in the plot are quite 
visible if you look hard enough.  Nevertheless, for anyone who is 
willing to suspend their disbelief (which, admittedly, isn't all that 
hard to do), THE GAME offers the kind of taut, unpredictable ride that 
Hitchcock would have approved of.
The website has moved!!
The new address is: http://movie-reviews.colossus.net/
"The cinema is not an art which films life: the cinema is something between
art and life. Unlike painting and literature, the cinema both gives to life
and takes from it..."

Author
Ted Prigge
Director: David Fincher
Writers: John D. Brancato and Michael Ferris (with a re-write by Andrew
Kevin Walker)
Starring: Michael Douglas, Sean Penn, Deborah Kara Unger, James Rebhorn,
Armin Mueller-Stahl
There's a scene late in "The Game" where the protagonist suffers what is
probably the most kafkaesque, surreal, and literally breath-taking
sight.  I'm not going to go out and say what it is, because, well, I
want you to see this movie, but when I saw it, even I felt as alienated
and paranoid as the protagonist.  This is the skill that David Fincher
has: to pull us into the movie so much, that we're as scared and
thrilled as the protagonist.  So basically, this is the most thrilling
thriller in a long while.  Well, since "Se7en."
Nicholas Van Orten (Michael Douglas) is a millionaire entropeneur-type
who owns a big company, a giant mansion his dad gave to him, and a new
ex-wife.  It's his 48th birthday, and he's more miserable than usual
since that was the birthday when his father killed himself by throwing
himself off the very roof under which he lives.  He's a control freak,
but more of a calmed-down one, instead of a frantic Steve Buscemi-ite,
who calmly yet with a sense of fatigue, works in his giant yet
claustrophobic office, and even has to be told by his secretary that
"Rachel on line 2" is his ex-wife.
That day, he also gets a visit from his black sheep brother (Sean Penn,
originally Jodie Foster, whom I can't picture at all in this) who gives
him his birthday present: "The Game."  It's something from a company
called "CRS" (forget the breakdown of this ackronym) that is meant to
relax rich people or something.  Nicholas is reluctant but eventually
goes to their offices, has a little chat with one of their heads (James
Rebhorn, finally getting a farily meaty role after all these years), and
is launched into an hour of bizarre exercises.
We, like him, have no clue what this game is about or the purpose or
anything about it.  They say it will come to him, and it eventually
does.  Weird things begin happening to him - i.e. he finds a clown
draped across the front of his house, dressed like his dad; his
television starts talking to him; and he gets a note telling him he must
follow some waitress he accidentally got fired from an elite restaurant
(Deborah Kara Unger, from "Crash").
The events start out like little pranks, but they soon become eery and
dangerous.  More and more bizarre things begin happening to him, and he
soon becomes incredibly paranoid, as do we.  We go through everything he
does, mainly because we get to know the character so well that he soon
becomes like one of those Hitchcock everybodies: a flawed human being
who plumets into a world of intrigue and surrealism.  Soon, Nicholas is
fighting an unknown assailant, trying to find the purpose of the game,
and trying to get out of it before anything worse happens.
By the time the film's over, we're as ragged as Nicholas.  We're with
him, praying for an explanation for what he and we have been through. 
And the ending would be a huge let-down if it weren't for the great
direction, which finishes up masterfully.
David Fincher is quickly becoming one of the better directors around. 
With his underrated "Se7en" behind him (not to mention the very
underrated "Alien 3"), he has proven that he can combine great style
with substance.  While "Alien 3" was just pure atmospheric fun, "Se7en"
had a satirical message, and "The Game" manages to try and fill in the
gaps of what's missing in the life of the modern-day Ebenezer Scrooge.
He's also obviously very influenced by Hitchcock.  As I said, the
Nicholas character is a pure Hitchcock character, but that's not where
it ends.  We also get a kind of bleak and gritty version of one of his
movies, some straight-out homages, and the strong sense of message
Hitchcock was so flawless at attaining.  I mean, all that's missing is a
walk-on by Mr. Fincher.  We even get scenes that are near duplicates of
some of his work, as well as some of the themes.  There are two scenes
straight out of "North by Northwest," there's a touch of "Vertigo at the
end," and there's probably even more if I went back and disected more
carefully.
But not only is this a kind of tip-of-the-hat to Hitchcock, but it's got
Kafka written all over it.  Nicholas is alienated, and is absolutely
alone at more than one point in the film.  And as the film goes on, he
gets more and more paranoid.  This kind of twisted horror view of the
world is exactly what Kafka wrote about, and this film is basically
modern-day Kafka.
As far as acting goes, Michael Douglas gives the best performance he has
in years, presenting a very flawed yet very likable man.  He's easy to
sympathize with, and you can just see him getting more and more crazy as
the film goes on.  He's in almost all of the scenes (okay, so he's in
all of them), and most of the actors are pretty much cameos or short
walk-ons.  
Sean Penn, in fact, is almost a cameo.  He has about three scenes in the
film, but he uses them nicely.  He's very slimey (he's the black sheep
brother, remember?) and at one point is incredibly nervous.  He does a
much better job than Jodie would have (even though Jodie probably could
have pulled it off, since she's one of the best actresses in the world).
Also, Deborah Kara Unger (who I had yet to see act) is amazing in this,
and should be picked up for more cool movies in the future.  She has a
very naturalistic style to her acting, making the lines seem more
down-to-earth than they would be coming from the mouth of another
actor.  James Rebhorn (who was in such films as "Scent of a Woman" and
"My Cousin Vinnie") is also very brief, but is excellent with what
screen time he has.  And Armin Mueller-Stahl is good in a very, very
brief role.
The writing is ingenius.  Yes, there are very agape plot holes, but they
never seem too incredible at the time, but that's really due to the
direction.  But we get a leisurely written film, starting off slowly and
letting us know the protagonist before everything hits the fan.  The
dialogue is witty and interesting, with some very funny lines that come
naturally instead of force-fed.
And, of course, the direction is amazing.  David Fincher combines
engrossing visuals with depth; atmostphere with purpose.  He brings
things to such high tension that there were whole scenes where I
literally held my breath until the big shock came.  As I said, he is
becoming one of the best directors around.
"The Game" is probably going to be written off as just a "very good
thriller."  But really, folks, thrillers this good do not come around
every month or so.  They're about as rare as a visit from the Comet
Kahoutek.  So appreciate this film, because we won't see a better
thriller until the next David Fincher film.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Author
Christopher Null
     Any more of that brooding atmosphere and I might have to strangle myself.
 I don't know how Michael Douglas does it, much less manage to keep himself
alive and kicking through two hours of torment, all of which may or may not be
a fantasy "game" his brother (Sean Penn) has enrolled him in.  Douglas plays
an uber-rich tycoon who has everything he could want and is bored to tears
with all of it.  When kid brother promises the game will fill in what's
lacking in his life, Mikie finds himself drawn to it, and a labyrinthine
all-too-realistic game of murder, deceit, and betrayal begins.  Set in my
newly adopted home of San Francisco, I find this city full enough of intrigue
even without machine gun-toting assassins and attack dogs chasing me around
back alleys.  And I can't imagine what I'd do if a cabbie drove us into San
Francisco Bay... but I suppose that's why you have to watch the movie.  As a
thriller, THE GAME is the work of a craftsman (SEVEN director David Fincher),
but be warned:  don't even *try* to think about the plot lest it break down
before your very eyes.  Instead, just think to yourself, "don't ever let this
happen to me."  You'll thank me later.
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Author
Steve Rhodes
    Nicholas Van Orton is an investment banker who is on a
psychological treadmill thanks to a birthday gift from his brother
Conrad.  As his answer to what to give to the superrich, Conrad gives
Nickolas a game for his birthday, and what a game!
     Imaginative director David Fincher, who created last year's crime
and terror masterpiece, SEVEN, takes a completely different approach
with THE GAME.  Whereas SEVEN was non-stop, in-your-face action and
gore, THE GAME is meticulously drawn with a pacing that is more subdued
that one expects in a thriller.  The carefully written script by John
D. Brancato, Michael Ferris, and Andrew Kevin Walker uses the entire
first hour to completely setup the plot.  Most thrillers would have
gotten down to business and had the audience on the edge of their seats
in the first fifteen minutes.  Although mainly a deficiency, this slow
opening technique does heighten the film's psychological warfare with
Nicholas and by extension, the audience.  THE GAME is not a
particularly violent film, but one that plays tricks with the mind.
     As the story starts, we meet hardened and cynical businessman
Nicholas in a typical day at the office.  Michael Douglas, in one of
his better performances, plays Nicholas as a man who starts off sure
and complacent but becomes adrift and highly agitated.
     Today is Nicholas's birthday, but, not caring about any human
being including himself, he finds the anniversary of his birth a
distraction.  When one of his minions wishes him "Happy Birthday," he
remarks that he never liked her.  At home in his mansion, his routine
consists of listening to the CNN Financial News network while enjoying
simple sandwiches served on elaborate dishes.  At work, he negotiates
big deals with a cutthroat attitude.  Miss your numbers by a few
pennies, and you're on the street.
     Nicholas's brother, played by Sean Penn in almost a cameo role,
surprises him at lunch with the gift of a game from Consumer Recreation
Services.  (As an in-joke, the movie has CRS used as the initials for a
variety of clandestine businesses associated with the company.)  All
Nicholas has to do is call CRS's phone number.  After he calls, he ends
up taking an all-day battery of tests ranging from questionnaires about
his treatment of small animals to an exhausting physical to test his
stamina.
     Nicholas, a control freak extraordinaire, detests the unknown so
he has questions for CRS's management.  CRS Vice President Jim Feingold
(James Rebhorn) answers Nicholas's queries about the game.  "The game
is tailored specifically to each participant," he explains obtusely.
"Think of it as a great vacation, except you don't go to it, it comes
to you."  He even goes on to claim that, "We've never had an
unsatisfied customer."  When Nicholas still remains baffled about
exactly what the game is, the VP tells him, "We're like an experiential
Book-of-the-Month Club."
     At this point the normally smug and confident Nicholas can only
guess what will happen.  With the arrival of a clown mannequin bearing
a key and a CNN/FN television announcer who stops talking about stocks
and begins to address Nicholas directly, the game is afoot.  Nicholas,
who in the past ignored everyone, begins to look carefully at each
person with the suspicion that they are part of the game.  The best
part of the story is that the audience also doesn't know either who is
a CRS employee and who isn't.
     The show takes one tricky turn after another.  Just when you're
sure you've got it figured out, you don't.  The multi-part ending is
easily the film's best part.  Although it is easy to convince oneself
after the fact that you guessed it all along, the reality is that few
people will be able guess half of the twists and turns in advance.
     Along the way, Nicholas hooks up with a sometime sidekick named
Christine.  Deborah Unger, last seen as the bored wife in CRASH, David
Cronenberg's ode last year to sex and car accidents, plays Christine as
a lovely enigma.  Although this is Michael Douglas's show, her more
limited screen time is suitably confusing and intriguing.
     As Nicholas descends into his hellish labyrinth, he begins to lose
his rock solid grip on his destiny and starts to reexamine all of his
assumptions about life.  "I don't care about the money," he declares,
ready to risk it all.  "I'm pulling back the curtain.  I want to meet
the wizard."  The engrossed audience feels the same way.  We've got to
know what in the world is going on.
     Fincher ratchets up the tension in the last hour and redeems the
picture's all too slow beginning.  With Harris Savides's dark and
brooding cinematography even the slow parts are never boring.  After
watching THE GAME, we at least know the downside of making too much
money -- it can be downright dangerous.
     THE GAME runs 2:08.  It is rated R for profanity and psychological
terror.  The film would be fine for teenagers.  I recommend the picture
to you and give it ***.
REVIEW WRITTEN ON: September 10, 1997
Opinions expressed are mine and not meant to reflect my employer's.

Author
Kah Seng
The Game
Michael Douglas reprises in part his tough, award-winning Wall Street
character in The Game's lead role as a successful businessman who decides
one day to take part in a "game" his wayward brother (the excellent Sean
Penn) invites him to play. The problem is, Douglas has no idea what the game
is, or what its objectives are, or even when it does begin. He finds out
quickly enough that there are no rules in this game.
The confident Gekko within Douglas disintegrates swiftly as his fragile self
stumbles upon puzzle upon mayhem upon deceit. Suddenly the self-control
which he relishes is wrested from him as he begins to perceive,
McCarthy-like, the reality around him and its events as manifesting
plausible connections to the game. Mirroring games in general, the adventure
escalates with Douglas discovering how the puppetmasters behind the game are
first, after his money, and then, after his life as well.
I followed the movie eagerly waiting for the next twist in the tale to
emerge, the next pitfall Douglas would be lured into. The realisation at the
end of the movie that it was a huge, expensive practical joke played on him
by his brother for his birthday was an annoying dis-revelation, but it did
not detract from the fun I had going through the show.
Granted, all movies manipulate the viewer's perspectives and affectations
and involve them to some degree in the story. But The Game is singularly
unique because it does so ironically. The movie itself is a linear game with
a closed ending, and it ultimately plays us the viewers, not Michael
Douglas. After a while, it is the movie-goer who is taken heart and soul
into the game, pondering over what had happened and attempting to predict
the course of events. To weave the various threads of the movie into a
coherent whole and wring out some underlying significance - that's what
movie-goers do. The recurrence of Douglas' anguish over his father's suicide
when he was a child, and the impressionable reference to the Bible seemed to
suggest some deeper moral that Penn is trying to get Douglas to perceive
through the game, at the end of which one may argue it has been achieved.
But I don't see any such thing; it is after all just a game.

Author
David Wilcock
Following the dark and disturbing Seven, David Fincher
brings us this dark and disturbing comedy about a man
driven to the edge over a dumb game. The man is Nicolas
Van Orten, (or Gorden Gekko) played by Douglas, who is
invited to play a game by his slightly mad brother, played
by Penn. Douglas, bizzarely, accepts, and his life is turned
upside down. While for Douglas, the game is a scary
experience, for the audience, it's all a bit silly. 
One of the problems with this film is that it inserts far too
many twists into the tale, some of them making no sense at
all. Whenever the film feels like it, it will put a twist in.
This is fine for some movies, but in The Game, it frankly
gets really dumb. Also, the ending can't hold up to explain
why there are all these twists! 
Also, the ending is awful. I've seen this bad endings (like
Halloweens) but this one's is really pathetic. After having
releative fun (I just ignored the twists after a while) the
ending just spoiled the whole thing. Tragic. 
So, what are the high points? Well, the film is reasonably
good fun (if a bit overlong) and it is bound to keep you
entertained until the last ten minutes. Douglas gives us a
fine performance (even though he had already played the
same character in Oliver Stones Wall Street) and Penn is
good as the brother. Douglas's 'girlfriend' during the film is
alright, and the supporting cast are all OK as well. The
direction is adequete, if occasionaly a little dull, but it never
reaches the dizzy heights of Seven. Fincher has given us a
film that is a little better than Alien 3 (although I quite
enjoyed that movie) but nowhere near as good as Seven.
Overall, then, The Game is a silly film, yet's it fun, but
with the worst ending of 1997. Which is a shame. 

Author
Michael Dequina
The Game (R) *** 1/2
        "What do you give the man who has everything?"  A few days of living
hell, apparently, and it is exactly that, concentrated into two hours, which
director David Fincher serves moviegoers in The Game, a wonderfully
unsettling and suspenseful thriller that launches PolyGram's new film
distribution wing with a bang.
        Michael Douglas is in his element as wealthy businessman Nicholas
van Orton: cold, calculating, and looking out for no one but himself,
Nicholas is exactly the type of sinful-guy-due-for-a-comeuppance Douglas has
built his career on playing, and, predictably, Douglas nails the role
perfectly.  When Nicholas's brother Conrad, a.k.a. "Connie" (Sean Penn, in a
role meant for Jodie Foster), gives him an invitation to a mysterious game
as a birthday present, the seeds of Nicholas's destruction are planted.
After extensive testing at the offices of Consumer Recreation Services, the
company in charge of the Game, Nicholas soon finds himself in one
life-threatening situation after another, which leads him to wonder if he is
indeed just playing a game (albeit a really twisted one) or if someone
really wants him dead.
        It is that question of illusion versus reality that propels the
intricate, unpredictable, if implausible storyline cooked up by writers John
Brancato and Michael Ferris.  Unlike too many mystery-thrillers, the writing
and directing remains one step ahead of the audience; just when one is led
to think one way, something twists our beliefs in the other, creating a
chilling atmosphere of uncertainty.  This is not surprising coming from
Fincher, who established himself as a master of mood with the unflinchingly
dark Alien3 and Se7en.  However, in those films, mood bogged down the pace,
thus stripping away the necessary urgency; a similarly slow pace would have
been deadly to The Game, whose implausibilities would not hold up if there
were time for close scrutiny.  The Game finds Fincher in a
uncharacteristic--and highly effective--faster gear, sweeping the audience
away on an unrelenting rollercoaster of plot twists and paranoia which
always stays true to the material's mean streak.
        Apparently not content to be a well-crafted funhouse ride, Brancato
and Ferris throw in a psychological angle to the proceedings which is not
satisfactorily developed.  Nicholas's birthday is his 48th, which happens to
be the age when his father took a fatal jump off of the roof of his mansion.
The trauma of witnessing his father's suicide at a young age haunts
Nicholas, and supposedly it shaped him into the man he's become, but it is
never clear in what way.  Not that anyone really cares--Nicholas is such an
unsavory character that it's hard to sympathize with him as a person, and
why would we want to?  Part of the fun in watching The Game is seeing this
unsympathetic character being dragged through the mud over and over again.
The attempt at audience empathy is at odds with the film's unremittingly
nasty nature.
        A lesson is supposed to have been learned at the end of The Game,
but I'm not at all sure what exactly that is.  But that hardly matters; what
does is that for a little over two hours, David Fincher takes the audience
on a breathless, harrowing ride whose considerable pleasures are measured in
dread and discomfort.
Michael Dequina
mrbrown@ucla.edu  |  mj23@the18thhole.com
mrbrown23@juno.com  |  mrbrown@iname.com  |  mst3k@digicron.com
mj-23@geocities.com  |  michael_jordan@geocities.com
Visit Mr. Brown's Movie Site at http://members.tripod.com/~MrBrown/
Personal Page: http://members.tripod.com/~MrBrown/home.html
Michael Jordan Sites:
http://members.tripod.com/~mj23/mj.html  &
http://www.geocities.com/Colosseum/Field/2302/

Author
Homer Yen
In the uppermost echelon of society, you would probably find someone
like Nicholas Van Orton (played by a staunch Michael Douglas).
Successful investment banker and multi-millionaire, he is certainly
not wanting for anything that is material.  After all, he owns a
lavishly decorated palatial mansion, a top-of-the-line BMW, and works
in the Van Orton building in a part of downtown where property values
soar.  In a sense, he is a man who has everything.  Unfortunately,
materialism is all that he is interested in.  Cold-hearted and
discompassionate, he is only interested in the bottom line and
increasing shareholder value, even if it means firing people on a
moment's notice.  So inflexible is he that even his wife is forced to
leave him.  He is the Scrooge of the 90s.  
One day, his brother Conrad (manic Sean Penn) pays Nicholas a visit to
wish him a happy birthday.  He ponders, "What do you give to a man
that has everything?"  Conrad, a recovering addict, seems to always be
on the verge of a breakdown.  But he claims that he's a changed man
because of something he tried...something sold by a mysterious company
called CRS...something that will "change your life."  He urges
Nicholas to experience it as his birthday gift.
The movie now begins to position itself as a psychological-mystery
thriller.  Things odd and haunting start to happen.  Did that CNN
anchorman just mention Van Orton's name over the airwaves?  Why did
that pen leak when it did?  Is that bum begging for money for a hidden
reason?  Significance or coincidence?  Hmm...   Nicholas is given
enigmatic clues and mysterious keys.  He becomes inexorably drawn into
a dangerous game where the rules are not apparent, and where he can
never tell if he's being put through a gag or if his life is in real
danger.  Immense paranoia begins to creep in as he begins to
scrutinize everything from strangers to friends, open bottled water to
even the sincerity of his brother.  
Questions constantly pop into his mind.  Is this really some game?  Is
Conrad doing something nefariously evil?  Who can he really trust?  Is
Nicholas just going insane?  It seems like everyone is against him,
and Nicholas learns through sadistic victimization just how cunning
and shrewd CRS is.  And as the movie progresses through its maze-like
plot, they begin to strip him of everything, from his $4000 suit to
his financial reserves to his dignity and finally his own identity.
But nothing can conquer his will to survive, and using his own cunning
and intelligence, and some impressive detective work, he begins to
piece together the puzzle in order to retake his life.
But, herein lies the problem.  The Game is a movie that's been broken
apart into pieces, like a jigsaw puzzle.  You think that one piece
fits, but then find out it doesn't.  There are twists and turns almost
every 10 minutes.  When you think you've advanced, you run into a dead
end.  But it's up to Douglas to fit those pieces together, and
depending on whether you like being kept in the dark a lot, we're
seeing it all happen through his eyes.
I appreciated the way in which The Game tried to keep viewers riveted
to the screen, urging the viewer to look for anything that might have
been a tangible clue.  This is also a handsome piece of film making as
we see the god-like Douglas gradually diminish into the background of
San Francisco's mystique.  And, I liked Douglas's alpha-male
personality. Douglas is in every scene and never drops his intensity
or focus.  The supporting cast and the eerie lead female who gives
Douglas hints into what's going on are equally good.  But while it's
sometimes edgy, the conclusions are letdowns.  And while there are
surprises galore, you become annoyed with the way the story yo-yos
back and forth.  
Also, despite Nicholas's increasing jadedness and growing disdain and
fury, things work out disturbingly and incongruously well.
Ultimately, the writers seem to lack the convictions of their
material, and work way too hard to resurrect Douglas in the last 15
minutes of the film, causing a very abrupt detour and a very sour
ending.  What could have been a unique psychological thriller is
reduced to a post-modern "It's a Wonderful Life."  I don't know about
you, but I've seen that movie way too many times.  I was not
particularly intrigued with this offering.  The Game provides the
satisfaction of outmaneuvering a better opponent at Chess, musters the
fill-in-the-blank allure of poker but gives the stop-and-go action of
Chutes and Ladders.  The Game toys with you, but you don't get the
reward that you deserve.

Author
Nigel Bridgeman
In 1992, director David Fincher made his feature debut with the
long-awaited Alien 3 and met with a savaging by critics and audiences
alike. It's doubtful if anyone thought they would hear from Fincher again
after this reception.
Three years later he hit back with the Brad Pitt/Morgan Freeman film Seven,
probably the best thriller of the Nineties. Suddenly Fincher became the
critics' darling; everyone seemed to conveniently forget his earlier effort
and, if they did remember it, of course it was because of problems with the
producers/screenplay/studio. Fincher was hailed as one of the best of the
new breed of directors and Seven received some of the best reviews of the
year. The Game, then, had a lot of expectations to live up to.
Michael Douglas stars as Nicholas Van Orton, an investment banker without
much to live for - he's rich, but is also divorced, lives alone and has no
life to speak of. On his 48th birthday, his younger brother Conrad (Sean
Penn) gives him a gift certificate for Consumer Recreation Services, a
company that specialises in entertaining clients. That's pretty much all
Nicholas knows about them when he decides, after much reservation, to pay
them visit, which doesn't help him in figuring out just what it is they do.
Not long after, though, his life is turned upside down by a series of
freakish events.
Douglas gives one of his best performances here. I've never been a huge fan
of his, so it was a pleasure to see him in the sort of role that Harrison
Ford could have made his own. In fact, it reminded me somewhat of Ford's
earlier Frantic, with both main characters not knowing just what the hell
is going on around them.
Penn appears briefly but is terrific. Jodie Foster was considered for this
role, which makes no sense at all. Foster, admirable actress though she is,
could not in a million years acquit herself, although it's probable that
the part would have been rewritten to accommodate her.
I liked The Game until the much talked-about ending. I knew that there was
some consternation regarding it from some critics, but I understandably
refrained from finding out what it was until I saw the actual film. I liked
the final scenes at first, but after the film finished I found that it just
didn't work for me, and so it tainted the rest of the movie. This is a
pity, because, for the most part, The Game is a fine psychological thriller
which, while overlong and in some parts over the top, is very enjoyable.
Some scenes are especially good (Nicholas' episode in the runaway taxi, for
example) but, in the end, this is one of the few movies I've seen where the
ending was so disappointing that the film as a whole suffered.
An admirable but disappointing effort, all the more so because it could
have very easily been a truly great piece of work. A second viewing may be
in order, I think.

Author
Steve Kong
How do you get someone interested in something? Better yet, how do you get
someone interested in a story? Even more specific, how do you get someone
interested in watching your film? Is it the plot? Is it the characters? Is
it the camera work? Is it the actors?
To spark the curiosity in the audience, to get them interested in the film,
the writers and director David Finch start the audience with one question
then compound that question with even more questions until the audience is
completely drawn in. The Game works well doing this.
Michael Douglas is Nicolas Van Orton, a rich cutthroat San Francisco
businessman. He drives a nice car, lives in a big mansion, and owns his own
business. His life is not full of surprises, rather it is organized and he
likes it that way. The movie starts on his 48th birthday. His long lost,
rebel-of-the-family, brother Conrad (Sean Penn) calls Nicolas. They have
lunch and Conrad gives Nicolas a strange gift. It is an invitation from the
Consumer Recreation Services group that invites Nicolas to participate in a
game.
The game as Conrad explains is a "life changing experience." Unknowingly,
Nicolas finds time one day and signs up for the game. A day later he gets a
call from CRS telling him that he is not qualified for The Game. But, that
is just the start for Nicolas. From there on The Game begins.
The Game is at face value is a movie about an egotistical man that is
reduced to nothing and learning humility. But, is it really that?
Everything seems to be spiraling down for Nicolas, and we follow this in a
roller coaster thrill ride type movie. Everyone has turn against him, and
like him, we as the audience are wondering which person is part of The Game
and which is not.
David Fincher, whose last two outings were Aliens 3 and SE7EN, shows us
that he is more than capable of handling directing and the camera. If
you've seen either Aliens 3 or SE7EN you know that Fincher makes films that
deal with the shadow as much as it deals with the lights. And with The Game
he doesn't change that style. His lighting and his attention to detail
create some very interesting camera work and scenes. The Game is as much a
piece of art as it is a thrilling film. The film just looks gorgeous.
Michael Douglas is perfectly cast as Nicolas Van Orton. He nails Nicolas'
emotions right on the dot. I can't see any other actor for this part.
The year seems to be the year of actors redeeming themselves after a
release of a mediocre film. Sean Penn makes a come back with The Game from
his mediocre outing in She's So Lovely. Though he does not has a lot of
screen time, he takes every minute that he gets and chews scenery. Penn is
awesome in The Game.
An unexpected joy of the film is Deborah Unger. She does really well in the
film. Watch for her as Christine.
Worth mentioning is Howard Shore's haunting score to the film. Shore also
worked with Fincher on his last film SE7EN. The score for The Game is
perfectly done for the film. 
Fincher again does a great job of shooting the film. His use of different
camera angles and lighting creates tension while keeping the dark mood. He
definitely has an eye for detail and this is seen in every shot of the
film. There doesn't seem to be a shot in the film that does not show
something important or is wasted on scenery. Fincher uses flashbacks to
describe Nicolas' past, fortunately, he does it with restraint and does
overuse the flashbacks. With Aliens 3 and SE7EN, Fincher shows us that he
is a very talented director, with The Game he shows us that he hasn't lost
his touch.
The Game is not without its plot holes, but, like a well put together
thriller, these do not hurt the film while it is running. Though after the
film the plot holes do show up when you think about what just happened.
The Game is a taunt thriller that entertains all the way up to the end. The
Game keeps the audience guessing through the film, thus keeping the movie
flowing. The beautiful camera work and light of The Game has to been seen.
The Game is definitely a Don't Miss Film. Catch this one in the theatres.

Author
Boyd Petrie
Starring: Michael Douglas, Sean Penn, Deborah Kara Unger, James
Rebhorn.
Director David Fincher has such an eye for detail which is very rare
in Hollywood these days (Terry Gilliam comes to mind as another one).
Film is one of the best art forms because not only can you tell a
story, but you can use the camera to capture the smallest detail and
have it mean something.  But most directors seem to go for action with
the slightest ounce of a story.  So whenever a director uses the
camera to its fullest potential, the film almost automatically
deserves a good review.  And when they add a fascinating story to it,
you have nearly perfect entertainment.
Fincher's The Game is no exception to this.  The Game is one of the
most interesting and complex films to come out of Hollywood in a long
time.  Fincher hasn't made a film since "Seven," his box office and
critical hit which defied expectations and became one of the best
movies ever.  So it is about time he made another film.  And what a
ride it is.  The Game isn't quite as powerful as "Seven," but in some
ways it is better.  Overall, The Game could have used a little more
clarity, or a little more uncertainty.  It walks a line of insanity
and reality, but it never goes either way until the very end.  The
outcome is satisfying enough for the preceding events, and it makes a
lot of sense once everything is set straight.  Unfortunately, unlike
"The Usual Suspects," we are never given enough information to figure
out for ourselves what is happening, whether it be true or false.
However, this also gives the film a frightening aspect which The Game
uses to the fullest extent.
The Game is told completely from its main character's point of view.
Nicholas Van Orton (Michael Douglas) is a high-strung and isolated
businessman.  He lives alone in his giant mansion, divorced from his
wife Elizabeth, and is celebrating his 48th birthday; the same age at
which his father committed suicide at, in the same mansion.  For his
48th birthday, Conrad (Sean Penn), the rebel of the family, gives
Nicholas a gift certificate to CRS: Consumer Recreation Services.  "It
will make your life fun again," his brother promises.  As skeptical as
Nicholas is, he is somewhat intrigued, and annoyed by the lack of
information--something this businessman hates.  Seeing a billboard in
an office, he decides to visit the mysterious company.  Jim Feingold
(James Rebhorn) greets Nicholas and guides him through the sign-up
process, which consists of psych-tests, physicals, emotional
responses, and other mind games.  "Each game is suited to each
person's emotional and psychological needs," explains Feingold.
One day, Nicholas gets a call from CRS and they explain that he failed
the tests.  Even more intrigued and now somewhat angered at the time
he spent signing up, he starts asking around to see what people can
tell him about the company.  What he doesn't realize is that the game
has already begun.  The phone call is just the first of many strange
events to be thrown Nicholas' way.  How he finds out that he is
involved has to be witnessed because it is amusing and fun and
visually impressive.  The detail involved in Fincher's shots is
incredible and almost requires a second viewing just to appreciate the
effort that went into them.  With "Seven," Fincher had almost every
single shot mean something.  He also has the unique ability to make
you look at exactly what he wants you to.  Compared to "Seven,"
though, The Game is light and comical.  Because of this film's sense
of humor and self-awareness, nothing can be taken quite seriously.  So
don't try to make much sense of what goes on in The Game, because it
doesn't want you to.
What does make sense is the final revelation--when everything becomes
apparent and clear.  If taken as it is, The Game's ending makes
complete sense.  But if you try and critique every minute detail, then
you get yourself into plot holes and incredibility.  Perhaps that is
the reason I docked the film.  While trying to remain realistic and
plausible, the plot is too unbelievable to create any real tension on
screen.  We don't really care if Douglas' character lives or not
because it isn't believable.  The ending requires you to have believed
anything that has happened previously, but if you suspend disbelief
and take the film as it is, you can accept The Game as an emotionally
and psycholically disturbing thriller.
Michael Douglas gives a terrific performance as Nicholas.  Douglas has
played lonely businessmen before, but here he adds another level to
his performance.  His character, who is normally level-headed and
relies on facts, is forced to trust nobody.  Can he believe the
waitress he bumped into?  What about his brother who got him involved
in the game in the first place?  Douglas portrays this aspect of his
character extremely well, and gives one of his best performances (even
better than his "Falling Down" persona).  The supporting cast is
essential in this film, and casting was critical.  Sean Penn is always
good, and he gives yet another credible performance as Douglas'
brother.  Deborah Kara Unger (from "Crash") is the waitress he bumps
into, and her performance is extremely good.  In fact, she almost
steals the film from Douglas.  James Rebhorn portrays his character
very well, and adds some confusion and desparation to Douglas'
predicament.  Another good performance comes from Armin Mueller-Stahl
(from "Shine") as the book editor.  But considering that Douglas is in
every single scene of The Game, he not only commands this cast, but
makes this distant and lonely character come to colorful life.
The Game is rated R for language, violence, some gore, and some nudity
and drugs.  What is essential for this film to work is the writing.
John Brancato and Michael Ferris have woven a confusing and compelling
screenplay with witty dialogue, and some very funny moments.  This
screenplay will probably get an Oscar nomination for Best Original
Screenplay because it does almost exactly the same thing The Usual
Suspects' did.  However, the visuals of The Game are enough to make
the viewer enjoy the vexing plot.  And if you can get yourself to
believe everything occuring on the screen, you will be thoroughly
entertained by one of this year's best films.

Author
Nicholas Amado
David Fincher's previous film, "Seven" showed great improvements on his 
first, "Alien 3". "The Game" is another step forward for Fincher, though 
in a slightly different direction. This is a thrilling, suspenseful and 
frightening, though somewhat unsatisfying film. As with many of today's 
pictures, a certain amount of "suspension of disbelief" is necessary in 
order to appreciate the events unfolding before you on the screen. But 
Douglas' performance, Harris Savides' photography and Fincher's gothic 
(though not at all grungey) direction makes this a classic thriller.
Douglas plays Nicholas Van Orton, a middle-aged investment banker living 
in the lap of luxury in San Francisco. He is divorced, he has no 
children, seemingly, no life at all. When he is not ruling the corporate 
world from the office, he is sitting at home, watching financial news, or 
flashing back to his childhood, when his father leapt from the family 
mansion to his death. Van Orton's younger brother Conrad (Sean Penn)  
visits him and gives him a birthday gift certificate for a company called 
Consumer Recreation Services, CRS. "Tell me you'll call", he says, trying 
to convince his older brother that this game will change his life 
forever. The events that occur after the call make it impossible for Van 
Orton to tell the difference between his own life and what he thinks is a 
game. Events based in reality happen in his club, in his home, in his car 
and in his office, and as the film progresses, things get worse. He 
begins to confront more and more people in a haze of paranoia, never 
having a firm grip on what is actually happening to him. Each non-related 
disaster that hits him justifies his paranoia, when he begins to feel 
that this CRS is out to destroy him financially and even kill him. 
Sean Penn is terribly miscast as Conrad Van Orton, the black sheep 
younger brother. Penn, who  receives second billing only because of his 
stardom, has essentially three scenes totaling approximately 15 minutes 
over the 128 minute film. An actor of his depth and intensity is wasted 
in such a small, unchallenging role. Only the cleft in his chin makes him 
the right choice to play a Douglas. Second billing would much more 
appropriately go to Deborah Kara Unger, who's performance as Van Orton's 
mysterious femme fatale is sexy and sinister.
San Francisco is used quite beautifully in this film. Fincher's expected 
grunge look is nowhere to be seen in this film. Rather he cleans up the 
look and shows us San Francisco in a rather different light. Very little 
in this film is bright and colorful, but the blues and grays that he uses 
give the buildings of the financial district an overpowering look at 
times, almost as if they are a big part of the world Van Orton is trapped 
in. Unlike "The Rock", in which San Francisco is primarily shown through 
tourist-like skyline shots, "The Game" shows San Francisco's downtown 
from mostly street level and constricts Van Orton and all the other 
characters, creating a claustrophobic feeling.
"The Game" is a thriller of the highest degree, with lots of things that 
you probably won't expect and probably havn't seen before. The shock 
ending will make you think about the events that developed, and justify 
some of them, and others may just bug you. But either way, Fincher keeps 
you glued to the seat. (I really had to go...I held it in the whole 
time.) He gives you an interesting look at an interesting city, and he 
gives you some things to think about. The frustration that builds up 
during the film should be relieved at the end, but whether or not it 
builds up again after you think about all of it, is up to you.
Three and a half out of Four stars.
Copyright (C) 1997 Nicholas Amado
*****************************
Comments? Complaints? Criticism? Debate? Email me: NAMIAM@AOL.COM

Author
Chad Polenz
Chad'z rating: ***1/2 (out of 4 = very good)
1997, R, 128 minutes [2 hours, 8 minutes]
starring: Michael Douglas (Nicholas Van Orton), Deborah Kara Unger
(Christine), Sean Penn (Conrad Van Orton), James Rebhorn (Jim Feingold),
written by John D. Brancato, Michael Ferris, Andrew Kevin Walker, produced by
Cean Chaffin, Steve Golin, directed by David Fincher.
seen at The Glenwood Movieplex Cinemas September 25 at 7:20 p.m. with Jamie
S.
        Every thriller has those moments of revelations where the plot suddenly
twists and we realize something was just an illusion and/or there's some kind
of conspiracy going on. I think the idea behind "The Game" was to make an
entire movie of those kinds of moments. The net result is a wholly original
film that puts the "thrill" back in "thriller."
        The film opens with a moody flashback shot with a Super 8 camera of cheery
1950s childhood images, but the montage ends with a disturbing, Gothic-like
sequence. Another director might have went for a more realistic approach to
this flashback and the film as a whole, but Fincher uses sheer mood to tell
us all we really need to know. 
        The boy in the flashback was Nicholas Van Orton (Douglas), a rich San
Francisco investment banker who's the epitome of middle-aged rich guys in the
movies. He's the modern version of Ebeneezer Scrooge: cold, stern, selfish,
and basically unhappy. It's his 48th birthday, and he's depressed because
it's the same age his father was when he committed suicide. He's visited by
his cocky brother Conrad (Penn) who gives him a gift certificate to CRS -
Consumer Recreation Services. CRS is some kind of business-level,
role-playing company that provides "whatever's missing in your life," or at
least that's what CRS representative Jim Feingold (Rebhorn) tells Nicholas.
        After enrolling in CRS, Nicholas finds strange things start happening to
him, the kind of things that could only happen in psychological thrillers
like this. His television starts talking to him, he finds keys and gadgets
with "CRS" imprinted on them. Soon the occurrences become dangerous and it's
clear Nicholas is wrapped up in some kind of massive conspiracy. But what
does CRS want? We don't get an answer for a while, and the longer the delay,
the more the suspense builds.
        What's good about the film is the fact it's such an uncanny premise told in
such a mainstream, commercial manner. Yes, we do get chase scenes and
shoot-outs but not only are they exciting to watch, they're actually vital to
the story!
        The mid-section of the film is the best, full of situations that are
far-fetched but completely believable at the time. The CRS conspiracy is so
huge, not only does it toy with Nicholas's mind, but the viewer's as well.
It's as if everything is a dream, but the script is so fluid it has a
hypnotic effect. Douglas is perfect as a normal man trapped in extraordinary
circumstances, one can't help but  sympathize for him.
        Special mention must be made to Deborah Kara Unger as the sexy waitress
Christine who is somehow pulled into the fray. Of course it's the generic
case of the man and woman stuck with each other against their will, but
thankfully the two do not fall madly in love by the end.
        There's many more important aspects to the plot and individual scenes worthy
of attention, but I won't mention them for two reasons: 1) attempting to
describe, let alone list them all would be an exercise in futility; 2) it
would be an injustice to the film. In fact, the details are irrelevant
because this is not a film concerned with plot, but a story that uses classic
literary devices in a modern manner and it works.
        The ending is shocking and brilliant. No further elaboration is necessary.
        It's apparent from the get-go "The Game" was inspired by everything related
to the genre: from comic books and pulp magazines, to the films of Alfred
Hitchcock and the writings of Steven King. You almost never see films this
resourceful.
Please visit Chad'z Movie Page @ http://members.aol.com/ChadPolenz - over 160
new and old films reviewed in depth, not just blind ratings and quick
capsules. Also, check out The FIRST Shay Astar Web Page @
http://members.aol.com/ChadPolenz/ShayAstar.html

Author
Jeff Walters
      I'm not a huge Michael Douglas fan.....maybe it's because he
likes to play characters that no-one could like. At the start of this
terrific movie, it looked like he would once again be playing an
unlikable.......a character who you just couldn't care if lived or
died. But slowly over the course of the movie, the character of
Nicholas Van Orton grows as he learns off his experiences.
     I have never seen Michael Douglas give a performance like this.
He was terrific - I can't imagine anyone cast to play the role of Van
Orton. Sean Penn plays his part well, but only really has
one or two scenes to make his impression. Deborah Kara Unger, who
plays the mysterious woman constantly crossing Van Orton's path,
performs just as well as Douglas does, and it's a full time job trying
to work out just what her agenda is.....is she really just an innocent
woman dragged into the Game?
      I thoroughly enjoyed this movie...up until the final two
minutes. Before I say anymore - let me warn you that I'm about to
give specific spoilers regarding the movies ending....so if you
haven't seen it and want to remain blissfully ignorant then flee
now.......they gone?....okay back to business. Van Orton has just
mistakenly shot his brother because he thought it wasn't a
Game, but a real plot against him. He is shattered and plunges off the
roof in despair much like his father did when he
was a child.....he is falling....and I'm sitting there thinking, Wow,
what a powerful movie.....still falling......this was
brilliant.....and then he lands safe and sound on a large air bag and
there is a big happy ending. I'm sorry, did I just see that?
        All of a sudden this dark and hauntingly brilliant movie is
all light and happy. No-one got hurt, all is forgiven. Even though
Van Orton was pushed to the brink of suicide and madness, everything
is immediately fine and rosy. The movie even ended with
Van Orton asking Miss Mysterious Woman out on a date......I don't
think I've ever seen a movie do such a 180 degree turn in my
life. What was a brilliant and powerful ending was thrown out the
window in favour of an unconvincing and sugary happy ending.
Why did they do it? My guess is that director David Fincher feared he
might might be condemned again after the huge negative
reaction he received the last time he made a character jump to their
death (Ripley in Aliens 3).
     This is a brilliant movie. You never know if it is a Game or a
con job designed to rob Van Orton of all his assets until the
end. But do yourself a favour, if you get this out on video - press
'stop' once Van Orton swan dives off the building, it will make a
much more powerful impression on you that way. For once, a happy
ending just really wasn't called for.

Author
David Sunga
Starring: Michael Douglas, Sean Penn, Deborah Kara Unger, James Rebhorn
and Anna Katerina 
Written by: John Brancato, Michael Ferris
Ingredients: Mr. Smug unravels mentally, dangerous babe involved, lots
of foreboding darkness, visual artistry.
Synopsis: 
Perhaps because of his father's suicide, Nicholas Van Orton (Michael
Douglas) has grown up to become a San Francisco billionaire who doesn't
value people and thinks nothing of putting them out of business. As a
birthday present from his younger brother Conrad (Sean Penn), a former
mental therapy patient, Van Orton agrees to contact a game-playing
corporation called CRS. He waits for them to start his surprise game, 
but he isn't told what kind of game his brother Conrad has volunteered
him for. Four or five live-threatening situations later Van Orton is a
haggard and penniless bum, and it seems apparent that the game was all
an elaborate ruse involving hundreds of actors in order to steal his
signature, access codes and bank accounts. 
Van Orton gets a gun intending to find out who is behind the game and
get his life back. Just when it seems all the cards are falling into
place and he has their scheme all figured out, the movie throws a
surprise ending at us, which was somewhat foreshadowed by Van Orton's
persistent flashbacks of his father's suicide.
Opinion:
It's slightly annoying not knowing what the game' is and why
omnipresent CRS con men seem to be taking Nicholas Van Orton's life away
until the final scene. But it doesn't matter because it's so fun
watching Michael Douglas not know either, and flail away trying to find
out. The plot keeps you in the dark about what's going on so that you
begin to experience a little of Van Orton's paranoia. Adding to the
murky feeling is the cinematography, which portrays all scenes in
darkness and dim lighting but high detail.
Michael Douglas turns in an excellent performance because he knows just
when to flash his smug I think I know what the heck's going on' smirk
and when to panic like a madman. Deborah Kara Unger provides great
support in the role of Christine, a mysterious waitress who seems to be
Van Orton's only clue to what may be going on. 

Author
Tim Voon
Cast: Michael Douglas, Sean Penn, Deborah Kara Unger, James Rebhorn,
Anna Katerina, Armin Mueller-Stahl Director: David Fincher Producer:
Cean Chaffin, Steve Golin Screenplay: John D. Brancato, Michael Ferris,
Andrew Kevin Walker
I found myself shaking my head continously at the absurdity of "The
Game", so much so that I developed a neck sprain. The director David
Fincher has tried to recreate the confusing "twist" and "turns" which
made his other movie "7" a success. If you like this sort of film that's
fine, but trying to keep the material believable is much harder. There
are numerous examples of how badly wrong, or how dangerous "The Game"
could have become. The prime example is Michael Douglas jumping of the
roof top towards the end, now tell me how did they know where to place
the cushions exactly?? Ooops a spoiler, but I don't recommend you watch
the movie either.
If you're wandering what I'm talking about at this point in time, I'm
not referring to Monopoly, Backgammon or Chess. Although all of these
games are much more fun to play than this particularly elaborate game.
Basically, it is the 42nd birthday of wealthy millionaire Nicholas Van
Orten (Michael Douglas). He is given a virtual gift from his unsuccesful
younger brother Conrad (Sean Penn). The surprise is that the gift
unravels itself in the form of daily experiences, encounters and strange
coincidences, which become weirder and more dangerous the longer you
play.
I didn't like "7" and I don't like this movie. It is disguised as an
elaborate excuse to thrill, when all it provides is a nervous twitch.
Talk about over working a person's paranoia. If my brother decided to
throw me a bash as stupid as this, I wouldn't hesitate to shoot him; and
I would be a hell of a lot angrier than Michael Douglas. Somehow, I
don't think being shot at, being drugged, being chased by dogs, being
drowned, being buried alive, being lost in a foreign country without
cash is very much fun. The only life changing experience "The Game"
provides is a nervous break down, not a hearty thank-you. Next time, a
simple birthday card will suffice instead.

Author
Christina Gross
With Michael Douglas, Sean Penn, Deborah Unger, Jim Feingold and
others
We've all been there at some point: a brother's birthday approaches
and you've no idea what to give him. They guy has got everything.
Including more money than you have. So you buy a nice tie. Or you hand
bro a gift certificate. 
Conrad van Orton (Sean Penn) give his brother Nick (Michael Douglas) a
certificate from Consumer Recreation Services. Nick is supposed to
play a mysterious game. All he knows about it is that it will change
his life.
And his life needs changing. Nick has money galore, but he's been
divorced for a long time and instead of friends he has business
partners whom he doesn't treat too well (WALL STREET revisited).
So Nick hands in his certificate. Suddenly he finds keys everywhere,
his TV starts talking to him and a mysterious blonde enters his life,
but not the kind that giggles and screams.
But there's more. He looses everything he owns, shoots his brother by
mistake and like his father many years ago sees only one way out of
his dilemma: suicide. He jumps off a roof - and lands on a giant air
cushion in the middle of his birthday party. After all, it's just a
game.
When his brother walks up to him with a big bloodstain on his breast
and a big smile on his face Nick doesn't punch him but gives him a big
hug, celebrates with his guests and even picks up the check.
I found that much harder to believe than all the strange things that
happened to Nick during the Game.
The movie is well made and features some superb acting especially by
Deborah Unger and Michael Douglas, but the ending ruined it a bit for
me. 
David Fincher cleverly made Nick van Orton a believable character
without slowing down the pace of the movie. In the end I just expected
more than a big grin plastered on Michael Douglas' face.

Author
Phil Brady
Michael Douglas plays Nicholas van Orton, a powerful businessman who
lives alone in a huge family mansion. Flashbacks show us his stiff,
humorless father, who took his life at age 48. Today is Nicholas' 48th
birthday, and we see him conduct his affairs with a cold efficiency. The
flashbacks show that he is comparing his empty life with that of his
father. Could he succumb to the same fate?  Conrad, his not-so-stable
brother (an easy role for Sean Penn) begs a lunch date, and then offers
his birthday present: an "experience," bought and paid for from a
cryptic company named Creative Recreational Services. "It will change
your life," Connie promises.
   Skeptical, Nicholas drops by their offices, where he meets a Mr.
Feingold (James Rebhorn, who was the CIA guy fired in ID4). Feingold, a
very un-slick salesman, explains CRS as an "experience-of-the-month"
club. After completing a battery of medical and psychological tests,
Nicholas is told only that his game will start soon. And an eerie start
it is. That night at home, TV newsman Daniel Schorr departs from his
copy to engage Nicholas in a conversation..from the TV screen! The next
day, Nicholas has a few unaccountable mishaps, and when he gets a
waitress fired for spilling a drink on him, he gets a message saying
"Don't let her get away!" And we're off.
An ambulance, a stalled elevator, and broken fire escape make for a
harrowing night on the town. Next day, Connie shows up, paranoid about
CRS, and then he disappears into the night. Stranded when his car breaks
down, Nicholas takes a cab, whose driver plunges the car into the bay.
It's getting a little rough. Reality is sliding, and Nicholas' only
clues are the ubiquitous CRS initials that keep popping up.
This movie's setup seemed like a good idea, and the first half  went
pretty well. Once the real action started, however, it was impossible
for director David Fincher to keep the illusion going. The incidents
were too free-form to have been staged, and there were instances when
someone playing for real could have killed someone. Nicholas was given
an 800 number that would let him call off the game, but he never even
considers using it. One elaborate break-in at his house could not have
been pulled off without the complicity of the housekeeper, but early
scenes showed that Nicholas was not the sort of employer to forgive such
a betrayal. In fact, he was way too reserved to fill out that
psychological questionnaire in the first place. 
There is one clever scene that takes place in a cafeteria, but it is
canceled out by an ending that would offend fans of the TV show, Dallas.
Michael Douglas does a good job with his part, and other character
actors fill in ably, but implausibility renders this effort stillborn.

Author
Harvey S. Karten
THE GAME
 By Harvey Karten, Ph.D.
 PolyGram Films/Propaganda Films
 Director:  David Fincher
 Writer:  John Brancato, Michael Ferris
 Cast: Michael Douglas, Sean Penn, Deborah Unger, Armin
Mueller-Stahl, James Rebhorn, Carroll Baker, Peter Donat
   Since David Fincher, who is at the helm in the new,
intriguing movie "The Game," is best known for his work in
bringing "Seven" to the screen, you know you're in for a
recklessly imaginative film.  Recall, if you will, that "Seven,"
which starred Brad Pitt as a young impulsive cop and Morgan
Freeman as a lonely, aging bachelor, featured some of the
most grisly scenes even witnessed in a commercial movie. 
Fincher's perverted murderer did in his victims by using the
Seven Deadly Sins as his scenario: one victim is forced to cut
off a pound of is own flesh while another is tied to a bed for a
year.
   "The Game" highlights no such gore, nor does it have the
dark, gloomy look of Fincher's 1995 work.  But like "Seven," it
involves an intricate scenario whose concept is to keep the
audience guessing along with the principal character--
speculating about both the rules and the ultimate aim of the
titled game.
   Now, then: we all know that games are contrivances which
most of us use to distract us from the seriousness of life. 
Chess, checkers, billiards, baseball, video arcades, visual
reality, and countless other diversions keep us occupied for a
time but rarely change our lives.  Even if we make a career
out a particular pastime such as chess, the recreation simply
does not shake us up by our very roots and change the
course of our lives the way a dam can alter the direction of a
powerful current.  This film, though, focuses on a birthday
present unlike the sort that any of us will ever get, a gift of a
particular diversion designed to do just that to one very
important individual.
   The individual in question is Nicholas Van Orton (Michael
Douglas), an investment banker who controls $600 million in
payrolls and pension funds. His job is to move money around,
which is, of course, a game in itself.  Other than that,
Nicholas is not the sort of fellow who goes in for any sport
which could take his mind off his business.  When people
wish him a happy birthday on his 48th, he's visibly bored.  He
virtually hangs up the phone on his ex-wife (who had left him
because he just wasn't there for her) and when an
administrative assistant wishes him happiness on that day, it
is Nicholas's own secretary who has to say "thank you,
Maggie."
  In short, Van Orton is always on top of things, a control
freak for whom arrogance and a refusal to tolerate the
slightest imperfection seem to come with the job.  To shake
him out of his pride and unfeeling nature, his more casual
younger brother Conrad (Sean Penn) presents him with a
most unusual birthday gift.  He is to call a corporation which
specializes in game-playing, take a battery of tests, and
simply wait for them to start the game.  What is the game? 
He doesn't know the rules, he does not know the aim.  The
audience is guessing right along with him.  Van Orton
becomes subjected to an ever-increasing series of episodes,
some violent and life-threatening, that make him wonder
whether this is the gift from hell.
   "The Game" is not believable for a moment.  For the
scenario to succeed, Van Orton must be cleverly manipulated
one step at a time to dig himself into the entertainment
corporation's rungs.  Failing to follow even a single
component would put the entire adventure into checkmate
and end the fun.  In some cases, a movie's lack of credibility
could sink the design.  In this case, David Fincher, utilizing a
screenplay written by John Brancato and Michael Ferris,
directs with such style, such a visual sense, that we are
drawn into the maze, and while we are emotionally caught up
in some of the more violent action sequences, we
simultaneously use our gray matter to try to figure what it's all
about.
   "The Game" features Michael Douglas in his signature role
as a high corporate executive, a guise that fits him like an
Armani suit, as he incrementally mutates from a Fortune 400
giant to a vulnerable, virtually defenseless quarry.  Deborah
Kara Unger provides considerable support in the role of
Christine, a beautiful waitress who becomes involved in the
activities of the mysterious entertainment company when her
own life becomes threatened, while Sean Penn--who looks
not at all like Douglas--comes to life principally when he goes
off the wall.  "The Game" includes an assortment of witty
lines--as when Daniel Schorr, giving a TV rundown of the
day's business affairs, speaks directly to Van Orton who is
watching the screen in his spacious home: "Are you going to
spend the evening looking at that clown?"  The movie
provides almost enough clues to allow the audience to figure
out the regulations and anticipate two particularly amusing
plot twists.   Rated R.  Running Time: 128 minutes.  (C) 1997
Harvey Karten

Author
Serdar Yegulalp
CAPSULE: Freaky and fiendish thriller that follows its internal logic almost
through to the end.
THE GAME is David Fincher's new movie after SE7EN, and like that movie, it
revels in the horrid feeling we have that things are scuttling around out of
sight and rearranging the chess pieces on us.
Michael Douglas plays a wealthy loner named Nicholas Van Orten, who spends
all day playing with other people's money and most of his night screening
his phone calls and watching CNN. His ex-wife still tries, futilely, to get
back in touch with him, and he's estranged from his brother -- who drops
back into his life one day and tells him about a weird, clandestine company
called CRS. For a fee, CRS will make your life "more interesting." Van
Orton, tempted, eventually caves in and signs up for whatever it is they
have to offer. They have a lot.
At first CRS seems to be something like one of those elaborate prank-pulling
firms, mixed with a live-action role-playing game. Little things go wrong in
Van Orton's life -- his briefcase gets stuck, his pen explodes, etc. -- but
they add up and go from being nuisances to outright maddening. Soon he's
running down an alley with attack dogs tearing his shoes off. Soon after
that he's being followed, stolen from, shot at, drowned, blown up, and
stranded south of the border, and I think I've missed more than a few
things. Through all of this, Van Orton tries to maintain his sanity and
enlist whoever he can to find out what's really going on.
The whole purpose of the game, of course, is self-encapsulating: Van Orton
is driven to find out who's screwing with him, and is then inspired to do
leaps of amateur detective work (and pure sweat). What starts as an irritant
becomes a way for him to re-evaluate how he deals with his life -- something
like full-contact est, although I doubt est was ever conducted from the
barrel of a submachine gun. It's a neat idea, but it's not quite played out
to its fullest here; the way the broken connections in his life are handled
are sewn up on the level of a bad TV docudrama, while the movie's real plot,
as frightening and convincing as it is, takes place in a completely
different world.
The movie's technical and thespian credits are top-notch. Fincher makes the
movie's backdrops and environments into genuinely threatening and harsh
places to be, not just movie sets; he immerses us the way SE7EN ate at the
senses as well. Douglas does a fine job of portraying a man whose nerves are
being frayed, then re-braided by hand. And Sean Penn does a nice turn as Van
Orton's brother. (Look fast for Fincher regular Mark Boone Jr. as a greasy
private eye, too.)
All of this doesn't change the fact that I felt a little put off by the
movie's conclusion. Without ruining anything, I'll say this: given the level
of psychic sadism shown in the movie, it's more than a little astonishing
that we get the ending we do. Maybe I was expecting the wrong thing, but
this is one of those movies where a Grand Guignol ending would have been a
perfect cap to the movie's deranged mission. Instead, we get a closed-ended
logic that while symmetrical, isn't nearly as satisfying as the tastes of
anarchy that we got throughout. But the ride is freaky and entertaining, and
unquestionably a shade different from the run of the mill.
POSTSCRIPT: ROT13 SPOILER DISCUSSION. DECODE AT YOUR OWN RISK.
Urer vf zl pbzcynvag, fcryyrq bhg n yvggyr zber rkcyvpvgyl. Ina Begba vf yrq
gb oryvrir gung gur tnzr vf n tvnag fpnz qrfvtarq gb frcnengr uvz sebz uvf
zbarl. Jung V rkcrpgrq onfrq ba gung frghc jnf guvf pbapyhfvba:
Nsgre Ina Begba fvtaf gur "ovyy" sebz PEF naq unaqf vg onpx gb uvf oebgure,
uvf oebgure gheaf, jnyxf bss, naq tevaf rabezbhfyl. Gur jubyr guvat JNF n
fpnz -- gur purpx sbe gur fvtarq "ovyy" jvyy tb qverpgyl vagb uvf cbpxrg,
naq gura ur naq PEF jvyy vaqrrq inavfu sbe tbbq. V zragvbarq guvf gb frireny
crbcyr, jub ehrshyyl fnj jung V zrnag. Ohg abguvat bs gur xvaq gnxrf cynpr,
bs pbhefr.

Author
Michael Redman
The challenge during this film is figuring out who are the players and exactly
what is the game. Ever felt that someone out there is messing with your life
and pulling the strings behind the scenes? Here there really is a "someone"
behind the curtain who's controlling the seemingly accidental.
Nicholas Van Orton (Michael Douglas) is a successful but emotionally dead
businessman who suddenly finds himself having a very weird day. Things happen
out of his control, his life falls apart, he hooks up with a beautiful woman
who leads him astray while pretending to be someone she isn't, people are out
to get him, nothing is what it seems and everywhere he goes he sees strangers
who are plotting against him.
And the amazing thing is that he paid for this! I know people leading this
type of life and they get to do it for free.
Van Orton has taken over his father's business. He spends his day moving money
around and his night pouring over business reports and watching financial
news. His wife left him because he wasn't emotionally available. He lives
alone in an enormous house alone with only a housekeeper for companionship and
she leaves just as he's getting home. He's so detached from humanity that when
someone wishes him "Happy Birthday", it's his secretary who responds "Thank you."
What a birthday it's about to be. It's his 48th: the same age his father was
when young Nick watched him leap from the top of the house to his death. He
works his father's business, lives in his father's house and now he's at the
fateful age. Stoic Nicholas is becoming even more morose.
His younger brother Conrad (Sean Penn) shows up to liven up his life. Leaving
a message at the office from "Seymour Butts", black sheep Conrad makes a
dinner appoint with his older sibling and surprises him with a mysterious
birthday present. He's bought a session of "The Game" and urges Nicholas to play.
After undergoing a grueling several hour session of psychological and physical
tests, he's in the game. The problem is that he doesn't know how it's played
or even what it is. The only thing he's told is that it's like a vacation that
comes to him.
Much like some computer games, it turns out that the objective of the game is
to discover the objective of the game. Going about his everyday humdrum life,
he finds objects -- keys, a handle -- that come in handy later. Minor
incidents that seem random take on a new significance.
It's intriguing at first to Von Orton and then it all goes horribly wrong.
Dangerous car wrecks, betrayals and deadly danger convince him that the game
is just a scam to pull off a major crime with him as the victim.
The film reminds me of several others: the complacent businessman is awakened
to real life by dangers. Michael Douglas' man in a suit in the midst of
adventure is different than Harrison Ford's. Douglas' character that he's
played in a few films is beaten to within an inch of his life and only hangs
on through his tenacity. He's a hero only because he's forced to be.
This is definitely Douglas' film. He's on-screen almost the entire time and a
lesser actor would be unable to pull it off. It's a credit to his skill that
the audience is entranced during the entire film.
Director David Fincher is a mystery himself. His previous films were the two
very different wonderfully crafted "Seven" and the wretchedly disappointing
"Alien 3". This film only shows some resemblance to either of those.  The long
movie (aren't they all now days?) never drags and that's saying a lot.
Is this film realistic? Naw. There's no way that the "Mission Impossible"
plans could be pulled off with the preciseness that they are. But it doesn't
matter. Toss aside your disbelief and go along for the ride. It's worth it.
If there is a problem with the movie, and there is, it's that there is very
little doubt how it will end. If you were allowed to think about it, what is
going on is obvious. Luckily there isn't much time to think and the downfall
of the film is only an afterthought.
I'm not sure I would recommend that people who perceive plots and conspiracies
behind every door see the film. This just might convince them that they are
right. And they're not. Or maybe I'm just lulling them into a false sense of security.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 22 years. At least that's
what he wants you to believe. Email your favorite paranoias to mredman@bvoice.com)
[This appeared in the 9/18/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at mredman@bvoice.com ]

Author
Bryant Frazer
       Filmmaking itself is a bit of a game. Directors, actors,
       screenwriters, and editors play it with their audiences all
       the time. You use diversionary tactics, you pluck at
       heartstrings, you appeal to the emotion, the intellect, and
       the libido of your audience. When the movie is complete, the
       studio marketing department plays the game, as well. The
       object of the game is to get butts in theater seats. On a
       slightly more high-flown level, the object is to engage,
       stimulate, and please your audience to the extent that they
       feel gratified by the experience -- and tell their friends
       about the little game you're playing so that they can buy
       tickets, too. And the filmmakers find out whether they've won
       when the box office receipts start coming in.
       David Fincher is hardly the first director to exploit his own
       uncanny gamesmanship, but he's done it as compellingly as
       anyone since Hitchcock. Granted, his debut feature, ALIEN3,
       took a swan dive at the box office that mirrored the film's
       almost ritual sacrifice of an SF cinema icon. (Fincher says
       the film is less than he wanted it to be, and blames studio
       interference.) But who would have thought that SE7EN, an
       unremittingly pessimistic serial killer film -- in which the
       serial killer plays a self-righteously depraved game with two
       big-city detectives and wins -- would score more than $100
       million at the domestic box office, with or without Brad Pitt
       on board?
       As I write, it's hard to tell how solid a commercial hit THE
       GAME may or may not be, although the general reaction of the
       audience on opening night was one of near-euphoria, with
       laughter, gasps, and even screaming throughout and widespread
       applause at the ending credits. In fact, I hardly know where
       to start criticizing it, because the pay-off is so terrific.
       Even if you guess the film's ultimate resolution -- and I
       did, although I kept telling myself that even this screenplay
       couldn't possibly resort to such a wildly implausible device
       -- the execution and follow-through is dazzling.
       Michael Douglas, the quintessential white man in trouble,
       plays Nicholas Van Orton, a wealthy, steely, and entirely
       troubled gazillionaire. (You may recognize a little bit of
       your boss in him.) He perches atop a megacorporation
       headquartered in San Francisco, and works his employees
       ragged -- but not, he believes, unfairly or without good
       reason. He's devoted to the bottom line, and puts a sourly
       positive spin on his firing of an underperforming executive
       (Armin Mueller-Stahl) -- more time to go sailing, Van Orton
       assures him. He regards his ex-wife (Anna Katerina), who
       clearly remains worried about his soul, coldy. He lives in
       the long shadow of his father, who committed suicide by
       jumping from the roof of the family home.
       He's visited by his estranged brother, Conrad (Sean Penn),
       who offers him an unusual birthday present -- a gift
       certificate for a personalized "game" orchestrated by a
       high-tech company called Consumer Recreation Services, or CRS
       for short. "They make your life fun," he promises. Resistant
       to the idea but intrigued at the same time, Nicholas
       eventually finds himself at the CRS offices, submitting to a
       battery of psychological tests and a physical exam that will
       help the company tailor a game just for him. Soon, Nicholas
       arrives at home to find a clown dummy splayed across his
       driveway, just as his father was found. Nicholas finds a key
       in the clown's mouth, and suddenly starts receiving some very
       strange television programming.
       And so the game is afoot. The movie seems to take some cues
       from John Frankenheimer's sinister SECONDS, but without that
       film's chilly sensibility. The general mood is closer kin to
       Martin Scorsese's one-night-in-New-York farce AFTER HOURS,
       with more sinister overtones but with the same general
       trajectory. Nicholas bonds with Christine (Deborah Kara
       Unger, seen earlier this year in Crash), a
       wrong-place-at-the-wrong-time waitress who dumps drinks all
       over his expensive suit and then helps him escape after he
       finds himself, mysteriously, trespassing at CRS offices after
       hours. Lost credit cards, Swiss bank accounts, a crypt in
       Mexico and a first edition of TO KILL A MOCKINGBIRD will all
       figure into the picture as the game plays itself out. Justly
       paranoid, Van Orton's task is to figure out what the hell is
       going on, and whether or not he's still just playing.
       The screenplay, by the folks who brought you THE NET (with an
       apparent polish by SE7EN screenwriter Andrew Kevin Walker),
       is effective but irritatingly simplistic. It relies on
       cyber-paranoia, the suspicion that anybody with the right
       technological tools can manipulate your televisioned,
       cell-phoned world to such an extent that you can't tell
       what's "real" anymore. What's more interesting is the
       sobering suggestion, left over from SE7EN, that a human life
       is really a sort of Rube Goldberg device -- that by setting
       up the right combinations of pulleys and levers, you can
       manipulate a person into just about anything.
       With the exception of a few choice lines that are accented by
       Douglas's deliciously dry delivery, the dialogue is mostly
       banal -- which makes it more and more difficult to figure out
       just what the hell is really happening. Some skillful
       misdirection by Fincher compounds the confusion, and Unger's
       smartly reserved performance drives us to second-guess
       whether or not she's really involved in what looks more and
       more like a truly sinister scheme. Douglas is fine, exuding
       that combination of privilege and haplessness for which he's
       so well known. Penn is only on-screen for a few minutes, but
       his performance veers effectively from relative serenity to
       hysteria.
       From a technical standpoint, the film is expertly gorgeous.
       Fincher remains one of the few directors in Hollywood with a
       visual style that pushes the bounds of what we think of as
       "the movies." Van Orton's repeated flashbacks to the life and
       death of his father are presented as Super-8 home movies --
       efficiently and beautifully, the flashbacks are signalled not
       by dissolves or slow pans, but by the abrupt change in the
       quality, color, and grain of the film itself. Fincher retains
       an aesthetic fascination with photography, with what it means
       to take a picture. Cinematographer Harris Savides photographs
       an incriminating a pile of Polaroids with the same sort of
       up-close, shallow-field inserts that made up a good portion
       of the chilling opening credits to SE7EN. Jim Haygood's film
       editing is virtuosic and world class, tapping into the rhythm
       of the characters and the story instead of relying on
       MTV-style hypermontage. Compared to what's playing elsewhere
       in the multiplex, this sort of breathtaking craftsmanship
       nearly qualifies as avant garde.
       For all that, THE GAME is almost breezily entertaining. You
       can take that as a compliment, but it's also a problem. For
       too long -- about the first three-quarters of the film --
       Fincher can't manage to escalate this particular game to the
       level of tension or exhilaration achieved by the best
       Hollywood movies, say a BREAKDOWN or a FACE/OFF. Meandering
       from situation to situation, the script takes pains to remain
       absolutely ambiguous, since the climax will its depend on
       being able to jerk our perceptions this way and that. The end
       result of this is that there's no sense of revelation for the
       audience, no moment when you feel things click together just
       right -- just twist after twist. Normally, I'm not a fan of
       this school of storytelling, which seems sorta lazy to me --
       THE USUAL SUSPECTS fell back on a similar one-twist gimmick
       in 1995, and Joe Eszterhas has used it repeatedly, to my
       great irritation (JAGGED EDGE, BASIC INSTINCT, and SLIVER).
       But THE GAME is a little more playful in its convolutions
       than those films.

Author
Dennis Schwartz

THE GAME (director: David Fincher; screenwriters: Michael Ferris/John
Brancato; cinematographer: Harris Savides; cast:Michael Douglas
(Nicholas Van Orton), Sean Penn (Conrad), Deborah Kara Ungar
(Christine), James Rebhorn (CRS representative), Armin Mueller-Stahl
(Anson Baer), Peter Donat (Lawyer), 1997)
THE GAME is a manipulative but entertaining film that falls far short of
director Fincher's more successful, SEVEN. Michael Douglas is seen in
almost every shot of the film, as he plays a part that he can probably
do in his sleep; that is, of a nasty, egotistical, extremely wealthy
white man who has everything that is material that he wants in life and
seems invincible until things start to fall apart and he begins to get
what is coming to him.
For his 48th birthday, which he celebrates in his San Francisco mansion,
his good-for-nothing younger brother Conrad (Penn), gives him a
mysterious present, called the game, which he reluctantly accepts,
wishing not to offend the giver. A company called "Consumer Recreation
Service," developed the game to imitate whatever it is a person is
missing in his life.
The game takes on dangerous pretensions, as Douglas wonders if this is
really a game or is it to be taken for real, or is he just being
scammed. His bank account is stolen, he is drugged, and someone is
trying to kill him, among the many other things that are now
infiltrating his once smug life. Yet, he is slow to do the obvious,
which is to call the police, or get his own people to take care of the
problem (a person in his position would not be tackling this by
himself). We watch him begin to unravel, and you are perhaps feeling
like I do at this point of the story, that I am being set-up, following
a tale that is so unbelievable, that I am being taken for a sucker to
buy into this. Anyway, we are not that concerned about Douglas, maybe
that's because we don't have much to go on why he is as obnoxious and
joyless as he is, except we learn that his father committed suicide when
he was a child and he never quite got over it. He goes through life not
understanding why his father did this to him, taking the suicide
personally.
The purpose of the film becomes to try and figure out what is going on
with this game, whether he is in a scam or not, and whether this will
give him a better understanding of himself, and if he can ever learn to
trust people. It also portends to be a psychological study of a
control-freak in distress, now unable to control his environment.
The best feature of the film is its unpredictability, it is what sucks
you into watching the entire film expecting something sensational to
take place. I thought any ending would be apt. I never got a sense that
what was happening mattered. And when you become conscious that what is
going on is all acting and only acting, even if films are just that,
nevertheless, they should hold out the illusion that what is on screen
is real, and if that is not so, then it becomes natural to lose interest
in the story and you become prepared to accept whatever it is that you
see happening on the screen, whatever the director wants to put in, any
logic will do.
I felt nothing as I watched to see if Douglas will commit suicide, or if
this is really an on-the-level game, or if Douglas will be transformed
by the game into a better human being (which to me would be the phoniest
way for this film to end). So when I saw what actually developed, I
could only think of how clever this filmmaker is, that he used the same
formula that someone making toothpaste commercials might use to catch
the consumer's attention. In this case, the consumer is the viewer, who
has no other reference points to find out what is true, except what
Fincher tells them is true.
Art is more metaphorical than that, commercial films are not, their
bottom line is always the almighty dollar and the gimmick that will get
it for them. This film should be pleasing to those who like to play
games. But the film will only work for those who are willing to believe
that they are in Nick's shoes, and can relate to the choices he makes.
The director is a graduate from the video and advertising world, well
able to work in that slick media market, who has come up with a novel
idea for a film but one that falls short in being credible.
Dennis Schwartz: "Ozus' World Movie Reviews"
Š ALL RIGHTS RESERVED   DENNIS SCHWARTZ

Author
Dan E. Kim
    Watching "The Game" will fill one with quite a few thoughts and new
concerns when they leave the theater. You'll never want to misplace
your keys again for one. Anyone suffering from clown-phobia will be
especially leery of circuses and Venice Beach street actors. These are
merely two of the many odd twists and turns people are asked to take in
throughout the entire film.
    "The Game," starring Michael Douglas, is a psychological thriller
in every sense of the word. It starts off letting everyone know a
little bit about financial baron Nicholas Van Orton, a businessman with
a knack for making millions but little else. It's almost Gordon Gecko
revisited. He lives and empty life with little outside of his office
and country club. He's so cold- hearted that he can so brutally fire
the head of a publishing company who also happens to be a former best
friend of his father without batting an eye; his father also being a
successful businessman who inexplicably committed suicide by jumping
off the roof of his estate. He alienates his ex-wife who is also the
mother of his child, he has a brother whom he hasn't seen or spoken to
in years (more on that later). When he goes home (which is the largest
house on the street), he's welcomed by his loyal maid who apparently
has been with the family for many years way back to when his fater was
still alive. An odd, unexplained quirk; someone as rich as Nick(worth
$600 million), residing in a large beautiful house, owning a counrty
club membership, driving a top-of-the-line BMW (750iL) with an ability
to dine at restaurants reserved for the socially elite; when eating in,
he dines on relatively simple fare of hamburger and fries, or a deli
sandwich with veggies. Are you following this so far?
    Sean Penn brilliantly plays the mentally disturbed brother Conrad.
true Penn-ophiles might be disappointed to know he is limited to only
three scenes, but what little screen time he's given is used to the
utmost max. He first arrives on the scene on to wish Nick a happy 48th
birthday and give him a card for a company called "Consumer Recreation
Services," or CRS. Incidentally, their father committed suicide on his
48th birthday and this topic become a taboo topic during their lunch
meeting. Conrad guarantees a life changing experience and Nick
reluctantly agrees to it. So the game begins. Or does it.
    Nick meets up with a rather creepy CRS sales associate Jim
Feingold. Upon agreeing to it, he undergoes a battery of physical,
intellectual, and psychological tests to see if he qualifies to play
the game. Following the game we come across an attractive waitress
named Christine (Deborah Kara Unger) who becomes a seemingly unwilling
sidekick to Nick's upcoming emotional mayhem.
    The movie is expertly cast, with Douglas being the perfect choice
to play the icy and arrogant Van Orton. Few others can play such a
character with enough flair, charm and self-deprecating humor to the
point that an audience starts rooting for someone who just blew off
his kind ex-wife who called to wish him a happy birthday.
    Master visual artist David Fincher takes viewers on a brain
twisting, darkly toned, and often depressingly moody view of San
Francisco, the city where Van Orton resides. Fincher, a relative newbie
to Hollywood who last thrilled and disturbed us in the brilliantly gut-
wrenching "Seven," takes us on yet another visual stunner of paranoia
and confusion. He has a Hitchcock-ish eye for setting the mood and tone
of movies by knowing exactly how much tension and suspense to use
without going so far as to completely alienate the audience. It helps
to take your brain with you when you go to see "The Game" since there
are a myriad of clues and hints as to what really is going on, though
nothing will prepare you for the ending of the movie. More on THAT
later.
    This movie isn't perfect, however. The otherwise well written plot
is so full of twists and turns that it's easy to not notice the artful
eye stimulation Fincher provides throughout the film. (Editorial note:
it's this very style that, in my humble opinion, kept Alien3 from being
a total disaster). Character development is enough for some, not enough
for others. We get to know Nick somewhat but we're provided few ideas
as to why Conrad is the way he is. Their relationship also isn't taken
as far as it might have been. Lastly, depending on how the Game strikes
you, the ending will either be fulfilling or a disappointment.
Whichever it is, the viewers must decide for themselves. Without
revealing anything about the ending, there is the obvious and
unfortunate Hollywood-influenced ending that almost orders on overdone.
    The first hour and half however, is a definite can't miss.

Author
Walter Frith
Director David Fincher's films are ugly.  They present themselves as
psychological thrillers but to date are indirect imitations of Alfred
Hitchcock re-invented for a whole new generation of movie audiences.
 Although in a different style, isn't there a guy named Brian De Palma doing
that?  Was 1995's 'Seven' really that good or was it 'The Silence of the
Lambs' with two cops mainly involved instead of just one?  The third
installment in the 'Alien' series was criticized for having atrocious camera
work and it gave the word dread a whole new meaning.  'Seven' and 'Alien 3'
were also directed by David Fincher.
His latest psychological wannabe is 'The Game'.  I always give a film the
benefit of the doubt until its conclusion and I walked in without prejudice
to Fincher's latest film.  This time I was not only disappointed but
surprised how one dimensional this picture is.  A wealthy investment banker
(Michael Douglas) is given a rather unusual birthday present by his brother
(Sean Penn).  Douglas is to contact a company called Consumer Recreation
Services and they will provide him with an entertainment which consists of
fulfilling the empty and oblivious side of one's life in the form of creating
scenes real enough to surprise and sometimes torment any client.  
The audience knows all along that the whole thing is a game but 'The Game'
tries to fool us from time to time with unconvincing scenes and large plot
holes.  It's also silly and absurd to believe anything presented as a real
life situation like this could happen and it looks like the screenplay was
banged out over a couple of days of wishful thinking and the desire to
entertain an audience is instead an effort that moves in circles and ends up
nowhere special and has only one reasonably good performance by Michael
Douglas to its credit.  All the other cast members with the exception of
Deborah Kara Unger have about fifteen minutes of screen time or less.
What's most disappointing about 'The Game' is that it runs out of steam after
the first hour and ends up in a stream of repetition that serves no point and
its nightmarish theme of psychological ends will perplex the most intense fan
of film thrillers and 'The Game' would have worked better had it been more of
a one character story and if its focus had been on real peril threatening the
people involved instead of offering no surprises which draw to a very
frustrating and empty conclusion.

Author
Alex Ioshpe
NOMINATED FOR 4 GOLDEN APOLLO AWARD
INCLUDING BEST DIRECTOR AND GOLDEN JURY AWARD
This film has the shortest trailer I've ever seen. For a brief moment a
short message passed the screen: "..From the director of "Se7en" -- 'The
Game'..". That's it. Indeed after creating "Se7en" in 1997, David Fincher
doesn't need any introduction. He is universally known as the creator of one
of the most horrifying and provocative thrillers since the dawn of
moviemaking. If he decided to remake 'The Exorcist' as his next film, nobody
would be surprised. The critics proclaimed that this "bright new star" would
not create anything "as provoking" in many years. His next film came
therefore as a big surprise, since it is actually better! This is a
gripping, dizzying and thoroughly entertaining thriller which bears no
resemblance whatsoever to 'Se7en', except in the obvious talent of the
director. Come inside..Players needed..
His name here is Nicholas Van Orton (Michael Douglas), scion of the
super-rich Van Ortons of San Francisco. Dark rooms, cold floors, and bland
gray suits abound as Nicholas tends to his daily business of being filthy
rich and alone. Wide screen views of his grand mansion or office focus on
the glorious facade of his life, but soon we learn that there is more
underneath this mask of perfection. Looking at him moving slowly within the
many rooms in his mansion, makes us realize his loneliness and misery.
Fincher skillfully crafts the image that Nicholas is a small cog in the
grand scheme, passively observing as his life slowly drifts away without
him, while his fortune builds effortlessly. Van Orton at first seems a
victim of his own making, but from the opening home-movie sequence and
occasional flashbacks, we get to know that his detachment from people is a
defense developed as a young boy after he'd witnessed his father's suicide.
Four decades later, he's a disturbed middle-age man himself, perhaps
predisposed to suicide now that his age matches his father's last year. He
is celebrating his 48 birthday as the last one -- completely alone, in his
gigantic and equally lonely estate. A spark in his everyday existence is the
appearance of his long lost brother, Conrad (Sean Penn). Knowing about Nic's
problems, Conrad offers him a special present -- a contract with Consumer
Recreation Services. "They'll make your life..fun". Suspicious about the
unknown company, Nic starts to ask around. He suddenly discovers that all
his friends and associates are members of what appears to be a powerful
underground company, with offices around the world, financed by men of
wealth and power. In order to play, Nicholas endures extensive physical and
mental tests, while also completing endless personality questionnaires. As
an answer to Nic's question "What are you selling?", the manager replies "We
provide..what's missing.." The 'game' is tailored to his particular needs,
determined by a grueling battery of psychological tests. The "profound life
experience" begins quietly but soon erupts in a confusing maze of
devastating events. Terrorized by unknown forces and shadowy figures who
seem intent on dismantling everything he has built, Van Orton has to win
this deadly game or lose control of everything in his life. A paranoid
nightmare, with enough violent coincidences and near-death experiences to
make Kafka give up writing and move to Sunnybrook Farm.
Fincher tightens the screws psychologically as well as viscerally. As tautly
as he can fashion a chase or an action sequence, he's even better at
creating a pervasive atmosphere of impending doom, or the unsettling
possibility that literally anything could happen next. The game overlaps and
overtakes his life when his house is vandalized and his company's funds are
tapped and drained. Even his friends seem connected to his downfall, and the
waitress, who turns up again, has more than just drinks to spill on him.
Technically, Fincher has captured the essence of the thriller through a
great use of his camera. The initial expansive views of Nicholas in his
home, seemingly possessing control of his life, begin to close in on him. As
the pressure on Nicholas rises, we find him trapped in elevators, running
down alleys and dank hallways, and locked in cars. Sweat and strain replace
the calm and command that Nicholas once possessed. The paranoia runs deep
and even Conrad does not appear trustworthy.
Fincher has wisely concentrated on Van Orton, making the audience share his
paranoia, suspecting everyone - while fighting an invisible enemy. The
supporting characters, including his own brother, appear as mysterious and
faceless enemies within a destructive machinery. Douglas is the perfect
choice for the cynic and cold business man. Nicholas is the product of the
American system, a product of society. He is the face behind the American
dream, living in its reality. Douglas is fabulous, both as the sophisticated
'king of the world' and as the confused and haunted victim. Sean Penn is
likewise incredible, trying to be Nic's opposite, never becoming like his
older brother. The other actors fill their small parts well, including the
secretive waitress. What do you give the man that have everything? What's
missing? And what's missing in the lives of business men and aristocrats is
suspense, thrill, fear and excitement, but mostly love and feelings.
- Fincher's camera work, brilliant editing and dark score create an
atmosphere, that would make Hichock look like a schoolboy. After making
"Se7en" he left us all shocked, with this one he dazzled and amazed us, as
he invited the audience into his intelligent maze of refreshing events,
ideas and thoughts. He left me in the theatre -- shocked, amazed,
enlightened, wondering: what's next?

Author
Randy Turgeon
    Nicholas Van Orton (Michael Douglas) has quite a dull
life. Although he is a very wealthy investment banker he lives alone
in a giant house and has no social life to speak of. On his 48th
birthday his brother Conrad (Sean Penn) surprises him by giving him a
strange present - an appointment with Consumer Recreation Services
(CRS). Conrad does not explain anything about the company or what they
actually provide, just to call and use the appointment. "It will
change your life" Conrad explains.
    After some thought Nicholas agrees. He spends an entire day at CRS
filling out questionnaires and getting vague responses from a CRS
employee (James Rebhorn) to his specific questions about the company
and its services. All he is told is that the company provides a game
that differs per client. Nicholas does not know what his game entails
or when exactly it begins. A previous CRS client explains to Nicholas
"The Game provides what is lacking in your life".
    Nicholas' Game begins. A message and a strange key are left in a
creepy clown puppet in his driveway. It is a sign of strange events to
come, including a night with a mysterious woman Christine (Deborah
Kara Unger) that consists of a fake ambulance rescue, a seemingly
broken elevator (that his mysterious key fixes), and fleeing arrest
from police and police dogs. Was the woman part of the game, or was it
a chance meeting?
    Events soon take a turn for the worst. Nicholas is linked to a
trashed hotel room (that his credit card paid for), that is littered
with pornography and cocaine. Soon Nicholas finds possible evidence
that CRS may be running a scam to steal money from clients at any
cost. It seems murder, bribery and blackmail are also part of CRS'
business practices. Running for his life, Nicholas must try to end the
game. Or is it all part of the game?
Commentary
    This is a somewhat familiar formula. Bad stuff happens to our
hero, and just when it cannot get any worse, it does. At one point the
Michael Douglas character is drugged and wakes up in Mexico with no
money, no passport and no food.  Ouch. The first movie that came to my
mind with this formula was "Pacific Heights", where Michael Keaton,
playing the tenant from hell, played landlords Matthew Modine and
Melanie Griffith like a violin until hope was (almost) lost.
    This is a better movie than "Pacific Heights", which bordered on
absurd.  Some parts of "The Game" was a little far fetched of course
(would firing blanks shatter glass?), but because the performances
were well done (especially Unger as the mystery woman), I overlooked
it. The story kept me interested, including a nice link between
Nicholas and his dad who (told in flashback) committed suicide when he
was 48, and the strained relationship between Nicholas and his
ex-wife, and Nicholas and his brother.
    The best part of the movie is the depiction of the strange
company, CRS.  Its employees are friendly, yet vague and misleading,
leaving a reason for distrust.  There are also some funny moments
involving some fake company names that are obviously a part of CRS. I
couldn't help but grin when Nicholas jumps into a cab only to see the
same exact CRS letters staring him in the face, or when he is chased
by the cable company van, conveniently called "Cable Repair Service".
    This is a good thriller. I cared for the hero and hoped he
survived unscathed. I hoped the hero and the mystery woman would
further their relationship. Do they? I'll let you find out for
yourself.
Directed by David Fincher
Nicholas Van Orton................Michael Douglas
Conrad Van Orton..................Sean Penn
Christine.........................Deborah Kara Unger
Jim Feingold......................James Rebhorn
Elizabeth.........................Anna Katerina
Written by Randy Turgeon. February 4, 1998
Visit my movie reviews web site! I just got started!
www.xtdl.com/~canran

Author
Kevin Patterson
The Game  * * *  (out of four)
R, 1997
Directed by David Fincher. Written by John D. Brancato, Michael Ferris, and
Andrew Kevin Walker. Starring
Michael Douglas, Sean Penn, Deborah Unger.
Corporate executive Nicholas Van Orton (Michael Douglas) has pretty much got
it made as far as cash flow goes: he owns an incredibly successful business,
he has a house the size of a small subdivision, and he doesn't even seem to be
working all that hard at it. He also makes for rather unpleasant company; he
is arrogant and apathetic, and he knows it - he doesn't even bother to respond
when his secretary wishes him a happy birthday, and his best friend seems to
be his maid. His life is luxurious but formulaic and, frankly, boring. Then,
one day, his brother Conrad (Sean Penn) arrives with a unique birthday gift
for him: a company known only as Consumer Recreation Services (CRS) will put
on a "game" for him to play. The twist is that he doesn't know the rules or
the object of the game; he knows when it starts, but after that it's up to him
to figure out what to do next.
This is the plot of David Fincher's "The Game," and if you think about it,
it's just about the best plot you could have for a suspense movie. With this
powerful, wealthy entertainment company pulling the strings, anything - and I
do mean literally anything - can happen; playing this game is like trying to
assemble a puzzle but not knowing what the final picture is supposed to look
like. In fact, one of the most humorous moments of the movie is Nicholas's
attempt to describe his progress in the game to possible-ally Christine
(Deborah Unger) - "I got the key . . . out of a mouth, from this . . . um . .
. clown . . . ." 
It isn't long, however, before what seems at first like a series of benign
practical jokes takes a dangerous turn; Nicholas understandably begins to feel
his life is threatened when the game starts requiring him to do things like
extracting himself from a taxi submerged hundreds of feet underwater.
Furthermore, his financial power and prestige evaporate through CRS's
manipulations, and he is forced to see things from the other side of the
fence. The lessons that he learns about money and greed are fairly predictable
and certainly nothing we haven't seen in the movies before, but this aspect of
the film does at least add a human element to the story and makes Nicholas a
sympathetic focal point for the atmosphere of fear and paranoia that Fincher creates.
The only thing wrong with "The Game," then, is that the story is really rather
ludicrous if given much thought. There were too many instances in which the
slightest deviation would have either cost Van Orton his life for real, caused
CRS's design to fall apart, or both. I found myself occasionally comparing
this movie to Terry Gilliam's "12 Monkeys" in terms of plot twists, but that
film had a narrative escape hatch in that it was a science-fiction story
involving time travel. "The Game" purports to be taking place in the real
world, and I find that a little hard to swallow. That said, this didn't
prevent me from enjoying the movie. And if other directors can get away with
flying buses, spontaneously exploding boats, and the like, then I suppose we
can let Fincher have an omnipotent entertainment company.
Visit my Film Reviews page at:
http://members.aol.com/KTPattersn/reviews.html

Author
Michael J. Legeros
     Michael Douglas is back in the genre that best becomes him, as an
emotionally aloof investment banker whose meticulously controlled uni-
verse begins to unravel after he accepts a birthday gift from his
lower-living brother (Sean Penn).  Said gift is a game-- an elaborate,
anything-can-happen mindfuck that's custom fit to the recipient's
physical and psychological states.  What's the objective?  What exactly
is supposed to happen?  No one is willing to talk.  Not the former
players, not the game's administrators, and not even the CNN financial
reporter that begins talking to Douglas' character through the tele-
vision set in his living room!  Get the idea?  Frankly, I found THE GAME
to be a bit of a bore.  Somewhere between the intriguing opening and the
richly satisfying final act, my eyes began to glaze over.  Maybe it's
the pacing-- twists and turns that come a little too fast to be fully
savored.  Maybe it's the sterility of the events and how nothing *real-
ly* sinister happens for an awfully long time.  Or, maybe it's just my
overactive imagination, which was busy trying to fit what I already knew
about the movie-- admittedly too much to begin with-- into the right box
inside of the right box inside of the right box.  Douglas is great.
Director David Fincher (SEVEN, ALIEN 3) is great.  Tech credits are
superb.  All that's missing is the disclaimer:  "foreknowledge of this
movie may hamper its enjoyment."

Author
Jerry Saravia
David Fincher's "The Game" is quite a mind-bending trip to endure, and it is
fitfully labyrinthinian and complex enough to give Kafka nightmares. It is
manipulative, thrilling, exciting, nerve-wracking nonsense designed to give you
a volatile charge every few minutes, and it certainly succeeds. 
Actor Michael Douglas gives us a solemn portrait of a wealthy investment
banker, Nicholas Van Orton, who lives in a luxurious mansion complete with a
forgiving maid (Carroll Baker) and little else. Nicholas lives in solitude with
just a television and a remote to occupy his time when he isn't working. One
day, he meets his smart-aleck brother, Conrad (Sean Penn) who gives him a pass
to CRS (Consumer Recreation Services) for his 48th birthday. This company
offers grand entertainment and big thrills - "It'll change your life," says the
grinning Conrad. 
It certainly does. Nicholas is initially reluctant for excitement but goes
along with it anyway. He undergoes an extensive, all-day application process
answering feeble-minded questions, enduring various psychological tests,
fitness exercises, etc. Eventually, though, his application is rejected but by
then it is too late, the game has already started. 
This is an intriguing premise for a movie because the "game" itself depends on
unpredictable surprises, and sometimes Nicholas is unaware when the game is
real and when it isn't. A waitress (Deborah Kara Unger) accidentally spills a
tray of drinks on him, but was it really accidental? Could there be a plot
against Nicholas perpetrated by a rival (Armin Mueller-Stahl) to take away his
fortune? Is Conrad behind all this considering he was a former CRS player? Are
people trying to kill him or is this just a game gone too far?
Without the right actor in the lead role, the movie's double twists and red
herrings would have been hard to swallow. Douglas is, however, perfectly (and
credibly) cast - he brings pathos to this cold, emotionless Gekko-type who we
learn to care about, and whom we believe may be in danger. This threatening,
terrifying game slowly brings Nicholas out of his repressed shell to confront
his feelings, his emotions and his desires. Douglas, a veteran of shattered
male egos from "Fatal Attraction" to "Basic Instinct," fully encompasses
Nicholas's fears, flaws, and horrible memories specifically his father's
suicide that we see in flashbacks. 
The rest of the cast does as well as they can with such a mentally puzzling
screenplay. Deborah Kara Unger (the siren from "Crash") is the obligatory femme
fatale - an enigmatic, voluptuous woman who is fired from her waitress job and
accompanies Nicholas to determine the extent of the game he's playing - she is,
of course, not what she seems. Nobody in the movie is. Sean Penn has a brief,
electrifying cameo as the tense (what else?) Conrad, and veteran actor James
Rebhorn is the sly CRS executive who vaguely explains the nature of the "game."
There's also a nice bit by Carroll Baker (Baby Doll) as the maid who tells
Nicholas stories about his father's past.
The movie "The Game" is not completely successful due to a cop-out finale that
renders the rest of the film as insubstantial - let's just say that Kafka was
never accused of being a sentimentalist. Still, director David Fincher
("Seven") imbues the screen with his shadowy angles and low-key colors making
the "game" as mysterious and frightening as possible. Michael Douglas makes the
film his own inhabiting every single shot of the film - we, in effect, are
playing the game along with him. "The Game" is not as daring or as original as
Welles's "The Trial" or Lynch's far more enigmatic "Lost Highway," or as much
fun as the Kafkaesque "U-Turn," but it is a finely acted, occasionally
thrilling diversion. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or general comments at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust667@aol.com
